Ohio, session 136, HB963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 1.64, 2108.16, 2108.61, 2111.031, 2111.49, 2133.211, 2305.51, 2907.13, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3705.01, 3705.09, 3705.15, 3705.16, 3705.17, 3705.22, 3705.29, 3705.30, 3705.33, 3705.35, 3705.99, 3715.50, 3719.06, 3719.064, 3727.06, 3727.70, 3728.01, 4723.36, 4725.27, 4725.40, 4725.53, 4725.56, 4725.59, 4729.01, 4729.39, 4730.01, 4730.02, 4730.03, 4730.04, 4730.05, 4730.06, 4730.07, 4730.08, 4730.141, 4730.15, 4730.20, 4730.201, 4730.203, 4730.204, 4730.22, 4730.25, 4730.26, 4730.39, 4730.41, 4730.411, 4730.43, 4730.432, 4730.433, 4730.437, 4730.49, 4730.53, 4730.56, 4731.22, 4731.297, 4731.33, 4761.17, 4765.51, 4773.01, 4773.02, 4773.06, 5122.10, 5164.301, and 5903.12 be amended and sections 3902.65, 4730.021, 4730.081, 4730.09, 4730.091, 4730.16, 4730.205, and 4730.23 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1.64. As used in the Revised Code: (A) "Certified nurse-midwife" means an advanced practice registered nurse who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a certified nurse-midwife in accordance with section 4723.42 of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the board of nursing. (B) "Certified nurse practitioner" means an advanced practice registered nurse who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a certified nurse practitioner in accordance with section 4723.42 of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the board of nursing. (C) "Clinical nurse specialist" means an advanced practice registered nurse who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a clinical nurse specialist in accordance with section 4723.42 of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the board of nursing. (D) "Physician assistant" means an individual who is licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code to provide services practice as a physician assistant to patients under the supervision, control, and direction of one or more physicians under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. Sec. 2108.16. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, a physician or technician may remove a donated part from the body of a donor that the physician or technician is qualified to remove. (B) Neither the physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner who attends the decedent at death nor the physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner who determines the time of the decedent's death shall participate in the procedures for removing or transplanting a part from the decedent. Sec. 2108.61. (A) As used in this section and sections 2108.62 and 2108.63 of the Revised Code: (1) "Health care institution" means a hospital registered as such under section 3701.07 of the Revised Code or a freestanding birthing center. (2) "Health care professional" means a physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; a registered nurse, including a certified nurse-midwife, authorized to practice under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code; or a physician assistant authorized to practice under Chapter 4130. 4730. of the Revised Code. (3) "Umbilical cord blood" means the blood that remains in the umbilical cord and placenta after the birth of a newborn child. (B) The department of health shall encourage health care professionals who provide health care services that are directly related to a woman's pregnancy to provide a woman before her third trimester of pregnancy with the publications described in section 2108.62 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2111.031. In connection with an application for the appointment of a guardian for an alleged incompetent, the court may appoint physicians, physician assistants, clinical nurse specialists, certified nurse practitioners, and other qualified persons to examine, investigate, or represent the alleged incompetent, to assist the court in deciding whether a guardianship is necessary. If the person is determined to be an incompetent and a guardian is appointed for the person, the costs, fees, or expenses incurred to so assist the court shall be charged either against the estate of the person or against the applicant, unless the court determines, for good cause shown, that the costs, fees, or expenses are to be recovered from the county, in which case they shall be charged against the county. If the person is not determined to be an incompetent or a guardian is not appointed for the person, the costs, fees, or expenses incurred to so assist the court shall be charged against the applicant, unless the court determines, for good cause shown, that the costs, fees, or expenses are to be recovered from the county, in which case they shall be charged against the county. A court may require the applicant to make an advance deposit of an amount that the court determines is necessary to defray the anticipated costs of examinations of an alleged incompetent and to cover fees or expenses to be incurred to assist it in deciding whether a guardianship is necessary. This section does not affect or apply to the duties of a probate court investigator under sections 2111.04 and 2111.041 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2111.49. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(3) of this section, the guardian of an incompetent person shall file a guardian's report with the court two years after the date of the issuance of the guardian's letters of appointment and biennially after that time, or at any other time upon the motion or a rule of the probate court. The report shall be in a form prescribed by the court and shall include all of the following. (a) The present address of the place of residence of the ward; (b) The present address of the guardian; (c) If the place of residence of the ward is not the ward's personal home, the name of the facility at which the ward resides and the name of the person responsible for the ward's care; (d) The approximate number of times during the period covered by the report that the guardian has had contact with the ward, the nature of those contacts, and the date that the ward was last seen by the guardian; (e) Any major changes in the physical or mental condition of the ward observed by the guardian; (f) The opinion of the guardian as to the necessity for the continuation of the guardianship; (g) The opinion of the guardian as to the adequacy of the present care of the ward; (h) The date that the ward was last examined or otherwise seen by a physician, physician assistant, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner and the purpose of that visit; (i) A statement by a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, licensed clinical nurse specialist, licensed certified nurse practitioner, licensed clinical psychologist, licensed independent social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, or developmental disability team that has evaluated or examined the ward within three months prior to the date of the report as to the need for continuing the guardianship. (2) The court shall review a report filed pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section to determine if a continued necessity for the guardianship exists. The court may direct a probate court investigator to verify aspects of the report. (3) Division (A)(1) of this section applies to guardians appointed prior to, as well as on or after, the effective date of this sectionOctober 12, 2016. A guardian appointed prior to that date shall file the first report in accordance with any applicable court rule or motion, or, in the absence of such a rule or motion, upon the next occurring date on which a report would have been due if division (A)(1) of this section had been in effect on the date of appointment as guardian, and shall file all subsequently due reports biennially after that time. (B) If, upon review of any report required by division (A)(1) of this section, the court finds that it is necessary to intervene in a guardianship, the court shall take any action that it determines is necessary, including, but not limited to, terminating or modifying the guardianship. (C) Except as provided in this division, for any guardianship, upon written request by the ward, the ward's attorney, or any other interested party made at any time after the expiration of one hundred twenty days from the date of the original appointment of the guardian, a hearing shall be held in accordance with section 2111.02 of the Revised Code to evaluate the continued necessity of the guardianship. Upon written request, the court shall conduct a minimum of one hearing under this division in the calendar year in which the guardian was appointed, and upon written request, shall conduct a minimum of one hearing in each of the following calendar years. Upon its own motion or upon written request, the court may, in its discretion, conduct a hearing within the first one hundred twenty days after appointment of the guardian or conduct more than one hearing in a calendar year. If the ward alleges competence, the burden of proving incompetence shall be upon the applicant for guardianship or the guardian, by clear and convincing evidence. Sec. 2133.211. A person who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse may take any action that may be taken by an attending physician under sections 2133.21 to 2133.26 of the Revised Code and has the immunity provided by section 2133.22 of the Revised Code if the action is taken pursuant to a standard care arrangement with a collaborating physician. A person who holds a license to practice as a physician assistant issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code may take any action that may be taken by an attending physician under sections 2133.21 to 2133.26 of the Revised Code and has the immunity provided by section 2133.22 of the Revised Code if the action is taken pursuant to a supervision agreement entered into under section 4730.19 of the Revised Code, including, if applicable, the policies of a health care facility in which the physician assistant is practicing, subject to the physician assistant's authority to practice as provided in section 4730.08 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2305.51. (A)(1) As used in this section: (a) "Civil Rights" has the same meaning as in section 5122.301 of the Revised Code. (b) "Mental health client or patient" means an individual who is receiving mental health services from a mental health professional or organization. (c) "Mental health organization" means an organization that engages one or more mental health professionals to provide mental health services to one or more mental health clients or patients. (d) "Mental health professional" means an individual who is licensed, certified, or registered under the Revised Code, or otherwise authorized in this state, to provide mental health services for compensation, remuneration, or other personal gain. (e) "Mental health service" means a service provided to an individual or group of individuals involving the application of medical, psychiatric, psychological, professional counseling, social work, marriage and family therapy, or nursing principles or procedures to either of the following: (i) The assessment, diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or amelioration of mental, emotional, psychiatric, psychological, or psychosocial disorders or diseases, as described in the most recent edition of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders published by the American psychiatric association; (ii) The assessment or improvement of mental, emotional, psychiatric, psychological, or psychosocial adjustment or functioning, regardless of whether there is a diagnosable, pre-existing disorder or disease. (f) "Knowledgeable person" means an individual who has reason to believe that a mental health client or patient has the intent and ability to carry out an explicit threat of inflicting imminent and serious physical harm to or causing the death of a clearly identifiable potential victim or victims and who is either an immediate family member of the client or patient or an individual who otherwise personally knows the client or patient. (g) "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the same meaning as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (h) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 2305.25 of the Revised Code. (i) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (j) "Physician assistant" has the same meaning as in section 4730.01 means an individual who is licensed to practice as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (k) "Certified mental health assistant" has the same meaning as in section 4772.01 of the Revised Code. (2) For the purpose of this section, in the case of a threat to a readily identifiable structure, "clearly identifiable potential victim" includes any potential occupant of the structure. (B) A mental health professional or mental health organization may be held liable in damages in a civil action, or may be made subject to disciplinary action by an entity with licensing or other regulatory authority over the professional or organization, for serious physical harm or death resulting from failing to predict, warn of, or take precautions to provide protection from the violent behavior of a mental health client or patient, only if the client or patient or a knowledgeable person has communicated to the professional or organization an explicit threat of inflicting imminent and serious physical harm to or causing the death of one or more clearly identifiable potential victims, the professional or organization has reason to believe that the client or patient has the intent and ability to carry out the threat, and the professional or organization fails to take one or more of the following actions in a timely manner: (1) Exercise any authority the professional or organization possesses to hospitalize the client or patient on an emergency basis pursuant to section 5122.10 of the Revised Code; (2) Exercise any authority the professional or organization possesses to have the client or patient involuntarily or voluntarily hospitalized under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code; (3) Establish and undertake a documented treatment plan that is reasonably calculated, according to appropriate standards of professional practice, to eliminate the possibility that the client or patient will carry out the threat, and, concurrent with establishing and undertaking the treatment plan, initiate arrangements for a second opinion risk assessment through a management consultation about the treatment plan with, in the case of a mental health organization, the clinical director of the organization, or, in the case of a mental health professional who is not acting as part of a mental health organization, any mental health professional who is licensed to engage in independent practice; (4) Communicate to a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the area where each potential victim resides, where a structure threatened by a mental health client or patient is located, or where the mental health client or patient resides, and if feasible, communicate to each potential victim or a potential victim's parent or guardian if the potential victim is a minor or has been adjudicated incompetent, all of the following information: (a) The nature of the threat; (b) The identity of the mental health client or patient making the threat; (c) The identity of each potential victim of the threat. (C) All of the following apply when a mental health professional or organization takes one or more of the actions set forth in divisions (B)(1) to (4) of this section: (1) The mental health professional or organization shall consider each of the alternatives set forth and shall document the reasons for choosing or rejecting each alternative. (2) The mental health professional or organization may give special consideration to those alternatives which, consistent with public safety, would least abridge the rights of the mental health client or patient established under the Revised Code, including the rights specified in sections 5122.27 to 5122.31 of the Revised Code. (3) The mental health professional or organization is not required to take an action that, in the exercise of reasonable professional judgment, would physically endanger the professional or organization, increase the danger to a potential victim, or increase the danger to the mental health client or patient. (4) The mental health professional or organization is not liable in damages in a civil action, and shall not be made subject to disciplinary action by any entity with licensing or other regulatory authority over the professional or organization, for disclosing any confidential information about a mental health client or patient that is disclosed for the purpose of taking any of the actions. (D) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, certified mental health assistant, or hospital is not liable in damages in a civil action, and shall not be made subject to disciplinary action by any entity with licensing or other regulatory authority, for doing either of the following: (1) Failing to discharge or to allow a patient to leave the facility if the physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, certified mental health assistant, or hospital believes in the good faith exercise of professional medical, advanced practice registered nursing, physician assistant, or certified mental health assistant judgment according to appropriate standards of professional practice that the patient has a mental health condition that threatens the safety of the patient or others; (2) Discharging a patient whom the physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, certified mental health assistant, or hospital believes in the good faith exercise of professional medical, advanced practice registered nursing, physician assistant, or certified mental health assistant judgment according to appropriate standards of professional practice not to have a mental health condition that threatens the safety of the patient or others. (E) The immunities from civil liability and disciplinary action conferred by this section are in addition to and not in limitation of any immunity conferred on a mental health professional or organization or on a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, certified mental health assistant, or hospital by any other section of the Revised Code or by judicial precedent. (F) This section does not affect the civil rights of a mental health client or patient under Ohio or federal law. Sec. 2907.13. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Human reproductive material" means: (a) Human spermatozoa or ova; (b) A human organism at any stage of development from fertilized ovum to embryo. (2) "Assisted reproduction" means a method of causing pregnancy other than through sexual intercourse including all of the following: (a) Intrauterine insemination; (b) Human reproductive material donation; (c) In vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; (d) Intracytoplasmic sperm injection. (3) "Donor" means an individual who provides human reproductive material to a health care professional to be used for assisted reproduction, regardless of whether the human reproductive material is provided for consideration. The term does not include any of the following: (a) A husband or a wife who provides human reproductive material to be used for assisted reproduction by the wife; (b) A woman who gives birth to a child by means of assisted reproduction; (c) An unmarried man who, with the intent to be the father of the resulting child, provides human reproductive material to be used for assisted reproduction by an unmarried woman. (4) "Health care professional" means any of the following: (a) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) An advanced practice registered nurse, as defined in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code; (c) A certified nurse practitioner; (d) A clinical nurse specialist; (e) A physician's physician assistant; (f) A certified nurse-midwife licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (B) No health care professional shall, in connection with an assisted reproduction procedure, knowingly do any of the following: (1) Use human reproductive material from the health care professional, a donor, or any other person while performing the procedure if the patient receiving the procedure has not expressly consented to the use of that material; (2) Fail to comply with the standards or requirements of sections 3111.88 to 3111.96 of the Revised Code, including the terms of the required written consent form; (3) Misrepresent to the patient receiving the procedure any material information about the donor's profile, including the types of information listed in division (A)(2) of section 3111.93 of the Revised Code, or the manner or extent to which the material will be used. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of fraudulent assisted reproduction, a felony of the third degree. If an offender commits a violation of division (B) of this section and the violation occurs as part of a course of conduct involving other violations of division (B) of this section, a violation of this section is a felony of the second degree. The course of conduct may involve one victim or more than one victim. (D) Patient consent to the use of human reproductive material from an anonymous donor is not effective to provide consent for use of human reproductive material of the health care professional performing the procedure. (E) It is not a defense to a violation of this section that a patient expressly consented in writing, or by any other means, to the use of human reproductive material from an anonymous donor. Sec. 3313.7112. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Board of education" means a board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district. (2) "Governing authority" means a governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school. (3) "Licensed health care professional" means any of the following: (a) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) A registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code; (c) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (4) "Local health department" means a department operated by a board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health as described in section 3709.05 of the Revised Code. (5) "School employee" or "employee" means either of the following: (a) A person employed by a board of education or governing authority; (b) A licensed health care professional employed by or under contract with a local health department who is assigned to a school in a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district or a chartered nonpublic school. (6) "Treating practitioner" means any of the following who has primary responsibility for treating a student's diabetes and has been identified as such by the student's parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student or, if the student is at least eighteen years of age, by the student: (a) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a current, valid license to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a clinical nurse specialist or certified nurse practitioner in accordance with section 4723.42 of the Revised Code; (c) A physician assistant who holds a license issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code. (7) "504 plan" means a plan based on an evaluation conducted in accordance with section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794, as amended. (B)(1) Each board of education or governing authority shall ensure that each student enrolled in the school district or chartered nonpublic school who has diabetes receives appropriate and needed diabetes care in accordance with an order signed by the student's treating practitioner. The diabetes care to be provided includes any of the following: (a) Checking and recording blood glucose levels and ketone levels or assisting the student with checking and recording these levels; (b) Responding to blood glucose levels that are outside of the student's target range; (c) In the case of severe hypoglycemia, administering glucagon and other emergency treatments as prescribed; (d) Administering insulin or assisting the student in self-administering insulin through the insulin delivery system the student uses; (e) Providing oral diabetes medications; (f) Understanding recommended schedules and food intake for meals and snacks in order to calculate medication dosages pursuant to the order of the student's treating practitioner; (g) Following the treating practitioner's instructions regarding meals, snacks, and physical activity; (h) Administering diabetes medication, as long as the conditions prescribed in division (C) of this section are satisfied. (2) Not later than fourteen days after receipt of an order signed by the treating practitioner of a student with diabetes, the board of education or governing authority shall inform the student's parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student that the student may be entitled to a 504 plan regarding the student's diabetes. The department of education and workforce shall develop a 504 plan information sheet for use by a board of education or governing authority when informing a student's parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student that the student may be entitled to a 504 plan regarding the student's diabetes. (C) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code or any other provision of the Revised Code, diabetes medication may be administered under this section by a school nurse or, in the absence of a school nurse, a school employee who is trained in diabetes care under division (E) of this section. Medication administration may be provided under this section only when the conditions prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code are satisfied. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code, medication that is to be administered under this section may be kept in an easily accessible location. (D)(1) The department of education and workforce shall adopt nationally recognized guidelines, as determined by the department, for the training of school employees in diabetes care for students. In doing so, the department shall consult with the department of health, the American diabetes association, and the Ohio school nurses association. The department may consult with any other organizations as determined appropriate by the department. (2) The guidelines shall address all of the following issues: (a) Recognizing the symptoms of hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia; (b) The appropriate treatment for a student who exhibits the symptoms of hypoglycemia or hyperglycemia; (c) Recognizing situations that require the provision of emergency medical assistance to a student; (d) Understanding the appropriate treatment for a student, based on an order issued by the student's treating practitioner, if the student's blood glucose level is not within the target range indicated by the order; (e) Understanding the instructions in an order issued by a student's treating practitioner concerning necessary medications; (f) Performing blood glucose and ketone tests for a student in accordance with an order issued by the student's treating practitioner and recording the results of those tests; (g) Administering insulin, glucagon, or other medication to a student in accordance with an order issued by the student's treating practitioner and recording the results of the administration; (h) Understanding the relationship between the diet recommended in an order issued by a student's treating practitioner and actions that may be taken if the recommended diet is not followed. (E)(1) To ensure that a student with diabetes receives the diabetes care specified in division (B) of this section, a board of education or governing authority may provide training that complies with the guidelines developed under division (D) of this section to a school employee at each school attended by a student with diabetes. With respect to any training provided, all of the following apply: (a) The training shall be coordinated by a school nurse or, if the school does not employ a school nurse, a licensed health care professional with expertise in diabetes who is approved by the school to provide the training. (b) The training shall take place prior to the beginning of each school year or, as needed, not later than fourteen days after receipt by the board of education or governing authority of an order signed by the treating practitioner of a student with diabetes. (c) On completion of the training, the board of education or governing authority, in a manner it determines, shall determine whether each employee trained is competent to provide diabetes care. (d) The school nurse or approved licensed health care professional with expertise in diabetes care shall promptly provide all necessary follow-up training and supervision to an employee who receives training. (2) The principal of a school attended by a student with diabetes or another school official authorized to act on behalf of the principal may distribute a written notice to each employee containing all of the following: (a) A statement that the school is required to provide diabetes care to a student with diabetes and is seeking employees who are willing to be trained to provide that care; (b) A description of the tasks to be performed; (c) A statement that participation is voluntary and that the school district or governing authority will not take action against an employee who does not agree to provide diabetes care; (d) A statement that training will be provided by a licensed health care professional to an employee who agrees to provide care; (e) A statement that a trained employee is immune from liability under division (J) of this section; (f) The name of the individual who should be contacted if an employee is interested in providing diabetes care. (3) No employee of a board of education or governing authority shall be subject to a penalty or disciplinary action under school or district policies for refusing to volunteer to be trained in diabetes care. (4) No board or governing authority shall discourage employees from agreeing to provide diabetes care under this section. (F) A board of education or governing authority may provide training in the recognition of hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia and actions to take in response to emergency situations involving these conditions to both of the following: (1) A school employee who has primary responsibility for supervising a student with diabetes during some portion of the school day; (2) A bus driver employed by a school district or chartered nonpublic school responsible for the transportation of a student with diabetes. (G) A student with diabetes shall be permitted to attend the school the student would otherwise attend if the student did not have diabetes and the diabetes care specified in division (B) of this section shall be provided at the school. A board of education or governing authority shall not restrict a student who has diabetes from attending the school on the basis that the student has diabetes, that the school does not have a full-time school nurse, or that the school does not have an employee trained in diabetes care. The school shall not require or pressure a parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of a student to provide diabetes care for the student with diabetes at school or school-related activities. (H)(1) Notwithstanding section 3313.713 of the Revised Code or any policy adopted under that section and except as provided in division (H)(2) of this section, on written request of the parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of a student and authorization by the student's treating practitioner, a student with diabetes shall be permitted during regular school hours and school-sponsored activities to attend to the care and management of the student's diabetes in accordance with the order issued by the student's treating practitioner if the student's treating practitioner determines that the student is capable of performing diabetes care tasks. The student shall be permitted to perform diabetes care tasks in a classroom, in any area of the school or school grounds, and at any school-related activity, and to possess on the student's self at all times all necessary supplies and equipment to perform these tasks. If the student or the parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student so requests, the student shall have access to a private area for performing diabetes care tasks. (2) If the student performs any diabetes care tasks or uses medical equipment for purposes other than the student's own care, the board of education or governing authority may revoke the student's permission to attend to the care and management of the student's diabetes. (I)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, a licensed health care professional shall be permitted to provide training to a school employee under division (E) of this section or to supervise the employee in performing diabetes care tasks. (2) Nothing in this section diminishes the rights of eligible students or the obligations of school districts or governing authorities under the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act," 29 U.S.C. 794, or the "Americans with Disabilities Act," 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq. (J)(1) A school or school district, a member of a board or governing authority, or a district or school employee is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property allegedly arising from providing care or performing duties under this section unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a school or school district, member of a board of education or governing authority, or district or school employee may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state. (2) A school employee shall not be subject to disciplinary action under school or district policies for providing care or performing duties under this section. (3) A school nurse or other licensed health care professional shall be immune from disciplinary action by the board of nursing or any other regulatory board for providing care or performing duties under this section if the care provided or duties performed are consistent with applicable professional standards. (K)(1) Not later than the last day of December of each year, a board of education or governing authority shall report to the department of education and workforce both of the following: (a) The number of students with diabetes enrolled in the school district or chartered nonpublic school during the previous school year; (b) The number of errors associated with the administration of diabetes medication to students with diabetes during the previous school year. (2) Not later than the last day of March of each year, the department shall issue a report summarizing the information received by the department under division (K)(1) of this section for the previous school year. The department shall make the report available on its internet web site. Sec. 3313.7117. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Licensed health care professional" means any of the following: (a) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) A registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code; (c) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (2) "Seizure disorder" means epilepsy or involuntary disturbance of brain function that may manifest as an impairment, loss of consciousness, behavioral abnormalities, sensory disturbance or convulsions. (3)(2) "Treating practitioner" means any of the following who has primary responsibility for treating a student's seizure disorder and has been identified as such by the student's parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student or, if the student is at least eighteen years of age, by the student: (a) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a current, valid license to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a clinical nurse specialist or certified nurse practitioner in accordance with section 4723.42 of the Revised Code; (c) A physician assistant who holds a license issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code. (B) A school nurse, or another district or school employee if a district or school does not have a school nurse, of each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district and the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school, acting in collaboration with a student's parents or guardian, shall create an individualized seizure action plan for each student enrolled in the school district or chartered nonpublic school who has an active seizure disorder diagnosis. A plan shall include all of the following components: (1) A written request signed by the parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student, required by division (C)(1) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code, to have one or more drugs prescribed for a seizure disorder administered to the student; (2) A written statement from the student's treating practitioner providing the drug information required by division (C)(2) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code for each drug prescribed to the student for a seizure disorder. (3) Any other component required by the department of education and workforce. (C)(1) The school nurse or a school administrator if the district does not employ a school nurse, shall notify a school employee, contractor, and volunteer in writing regarding the existence and content of each seizure action plan in force if the employee, contractor, or volunteer does any of the following: (a) Regularly interacts with the student; (b) Has legitimate educational interest in the student or is responsible for the direct supervision of the student; (c) Is responsible for transportation of the student to and from school. (2) The school nurse or a school administrator if the district does not employ a school nurse, shall identify each individual who has received training under division (G) of this section in the administration of drugs prescribed for seizure disorders. The school nurse, or another district employee if a district does not employ a school nurse, shall coordinate seizure disorder care at that school and ensure that all staff described in division (C)(1) of this section are trained in the care of students with seizure disorders. (D)(1) A drug prescribed to a student with a seizure disorder shall be provided to the school nurse or another person at the school who is authorized to administer it to the student if the district does not employ a full-time school nurse. The drug shall be provided in the container in which it was dispensed by the prescriber or a licensed pharmacist. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code, drugs prescribed for a seizure disorder that are to be administered to students under this section may be kept in an easily accessible location. (2) Notwithstanding division (D)(1) of this section, section 3313.713 of the Revised Code, or any policy adopted under that section, a student enrolled in a school district or chartered nonpublic school may possess a drug prescribed to the student designed to prevent the onset of a seizure or to alleviate the symptoms of a seizure if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The student has the written approval of the student's physician and, if the student is a minor, the written approval of the parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student. The physician's written approval shall include at least all of the following information: (i) The student's name and address; (ii) The name of the drug and the dosage, if any, to be administered; (iii) The circumstances under which the drug is to be administered to the student; (iv) How the drug is to be administered to the student; (v) Written instructions that outline procedures school personnel should follow in the event that the drug does not prevent the onset of a seizure or alleviate the symptoms of a seizure; (vi) Any severe adverse reactions that may occur to the student for whom the drug is prescribed and that should be reported to the physician; (vii) Any severe adverse reactions that may occur to another student for whom the drug is not prescribed, should such a student receive a dose of the drug; (viii) At least one emergency telephone number for contacting the physician in an emergency; (ix) At least one emergency telephone number for contacting the parent, guardian, or other person having care or charge of the student in an emergency; (x) Any other special instructions from the physician. (b) The school principal and, if a school nurse is assigned to the student's school building, the school nurse have received copies of the written approvals required by division (D)(2)(a) of this section. If these conditions are satisfied, the student may possess a drug described in division (D)(2) of this section at school or at any activity, event, or program sponsored by or in which the student's school is a participant. (3) Notwithstanding division (B)(2) of section 3313.713 of the Revised Code or any policy adopted under that section, any individual identified in division (C)(1) of this section may administer to a student a prescribed drug that is designed to prevent the onset of a seizure or to alleviate the symptoms of a seizure if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The individual has received a copy of the written approval issued by the student's physician which contains the information required by division (D)(2)(a) of this section. (b) The individual has received training regarding the circumstances under which the drug is to be administered to the student and how the drug is to be administered to the student. (E) A seizure action plan is effective only for the school year in which the written request described in division (B)(1) of this section was submitted and must be renewed at the beginning of each school year. (F) A seizure action plan created under division (B) of this section shall be maintained in the office of the school nurse or school administrator if the district does not employ a full-time school nurse. (G) A school district or governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall designate at least one employee at each school building it operates, aside from a school nurse, to be trained on the implementation of seizure action plans every two years. The district or governing authority shall provide or arrange for the training of the employee. The training must include and be consistent with guidelines and best practices established by a nonprofit organization that supports the welfare of individuals with epilepsy and seizure disorders, such as the Epilepsy Allianceepilepsy alliance Ohio or Epilepsy Foundation of epilepsy foundation Ohio or other similar organizations as determined by the department, and address all of the following: (1) Recognizing the signs and symptoms of a seizure; (2) The appropriate treatment for a student who exhibits the symptoms of a seizure; (3) Administering drugs prescribed for seizure disorders, subject to this section and section 3313.713 of the Revised Code. A seizure training program under division (G) of this section shall not exceed one hour and shall qualify as a professional development activity for the renewal of educator licenses, including activities approved by local professional development committees under division (F) of section 3319.22 of the Revised Code. If the training is provided to a school district on portable media by a nonprofit entity, the training shall be provided free of charge. (H) A board of education or governing authority shall require each person it employs as an administrator, guidance counselor, teacher, or bus driver to complete a minimum of one hour of self-study training or in-person training on seizure disorders not later than twenty-four months after October 3, 2023. Any such person employed after that date shall complete the training within ninety days of employment. The training shall qualify as a professional development activity for the renewal of educator licenses, including activities approved by local professional development committees under division (F) of section 3319.22 of the Revised Code. (I)(1) A school or school district, a member of a board or governing authority, or a district or school employee is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property allegedly arising from providing care or performing duties under this section unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a school district, member of a school district board of education, or school district employee may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state. (2) A chartered nonpublic school or any officer, director, or employee of the school is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property allegedly arising from providing care or performing duties under this section unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. Sec. 3705.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Live birth" means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception that after such expulsion or extraction breathes or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached. (B)(1) "Fetal death" means death prior to the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, which after such expulsion or extraction does not breathe or show any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles. (2) "Stillborn" means that an infant of at least twenty weeks of gestation suffered a fetal death. (C) "Dead body" means a human body or part of a human body from the condition of which it reasonably may be concluded that death recently occurred. (D) "Physician" means a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine or surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (E) "Attending physician," when used in the context of a decedent, means the physician in charge of the patient's care for the illness or condition that resulted in death. (F) "Institution" means any establishment, public or private, that provides medical, surgical, or diagnostic care or treatment, or domiciliary care, to two or more unrelated individuals, or to persons committed by law. (G) "Funeral director" has the meaning given in section 4717.01 of the Revised Code. (H) "State registrar" means the head of the office of vital statistics in the department of health. (I) "Medical certification" means completion of the medical certification portion of the certificate of death or fetal death as to the cause of death or fetal death. (J) "Final disposition" means the interment, cremation, removal from the state, donation, or other authorized disposition of a dead body or a fetal death. (K) "Interment" means the final disposition of the remains of a dead body by burial or entombment. (L) "Cremation" means the reduction to ashes of a dead body. (M) "Donation" means gift of a dead body to a research institution or medical school. (N) "System of vital statistics" means the registration, collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of vital records, the collection of other reports required by this chapter, and activities related thereto. (O) "Vital records" means certificates or reports of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, and data related thereto and other documents maintained as required by statute. (P) "File" means the presentation of vital records for registration by the office of vital statistics. (Q) "Registration" means the acceptance by the office of vital statistics and the incorporation of vital records into its official records. (R) "Birth record" means a birth certificate that has been registered with the office of vital statistics; or, if registered prior to March 16, 1989, with the division of vital statistics; or, if registered prior to the establishment of the division of vital statistics, with the department of health or a local registrar. (S) "Certification of birth" means a document issued by the director of health or state registrar or a local registrar under division (B) of section 3705.23 of the Revised Code. (T) "Certified nurse-midwife," has "clinical nurse specialist," and "certified nurse practitioner" have the same meaning meanings as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (U) "Physician assistant" means an individual who is licensed to practice as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3705.09. (A) A birth certificate for each live birth in this state shall be filed in the registration district in which it occurs within ten calendar days after such birth and shall be registered if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this section. (B) When a birth occurs in or en route to an institution, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative shall obtain the personal data, prepare the certificate, and complete and certify the facts of birth on the certificate within ten calendar days. The physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse-midwife in attendance shall be listed on the birth record. (C) When a birth occurs outside an institution, the birth certificate shall be prepared and filed by one of the following in the indicated order of priority: (1) The physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse-midwife in attendance at or immediately after the birth; (2) Any other person in attendance at or immediately after the birth; (3) The father; (4) The mother; (5) The person in charge of the premises where the birth occurred. (D) Either of the parents of the child or other informant shall attest to the accuracy of the personal data entered on the birth certificate in time to permit the filing of the certificate within the ten days prescribed in this section. (E) When a birth occurs in a moving conveyance within the United States and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state and the place where it is first removed shall be considered the place of birth. When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance while in international waters or air space or in a foreign country or its air space and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state but the record shall show the actual place of birth insofar as can be determined. (F)(1) If the mother of a child was married at the time of either conception or birth or between conception and birth, the child shall be registered in the surname designated by the mother, and the name of the husband shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child. The presumption of paternity shall be in accordance with section 3111.03 of the Revised Code. (2) If the mother was not married at the time of conception or birth or between conception and birth, the child shall be registered by the surname designated by the mother. The name of the father of such child shall also be inserted on the birth certificate if both the mother and the father sign an acknowledgement acknowledgment of paternity affidavit before the birth record has been sent to the local registrar. If the father is not named on the birth certificate pursuant to division (F)(1) or (2) of this section, no other information about the father shall be entered on the record. (G) When a man is presumed, found, or declared to be the father of a child, according to section 2105.26, sections 3111.01 to 3111.18, former section 3111.21, or sections 3111.38 to 3111.54 of the Revised Code, or the father has acknowledged the child as his child in an acknowledgment of paternity, and the acknowledgment has become final pursuant to section 2151.232, 3111.25, or 3111.821 of the Revised Code, and documentary evidence of such fact is submitted to the department of health in such form as the director may require, a new birth record shall be issued by the department which shall have the same overall appearance as the record which would have been issued under this section if a marriage had occurred before the birth of such child. Where handwriting is required to effect such appearance, the department shall supply it. Upon the issuance of such new birth record, the original birth record shall cease to be a public record. Except as provided in division (C) of section 3705.091 of the Revised Code, the original record and any documentary evidence supporting the new registration of birth shall be placed in an envelope which shall be sealed by the department and shall not be open to inspection or copy unless so ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. (H) Every birth certificate filed under this section on or after July 1, 1990, shall be accompanied by all social security numbers that have been issued to the parents of the child, unless the division of child support in the department of job and family services, acting in accordance with regulations prescribed under the "Family Support Act of 1988," 102 Stat. 2353, 42 U.S.C.A. 405, as amended, finds good cause for not requiring that the numbers be furnished with the certificate. The parents' social security numbers shall not be recorded on the certificate. No social security number obtained under this division shall be used for any purpose other than the purposes specified in division (B)(1) of section 3705.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3705.15. Whoever claims to have been born in this state, and whose registration of birth is not recorded, or has been lost or destroyed, or has not been properly and accurately recorded, may file an application for registration of birth or correction of the birth record in the probate court of the county of the person's birth or residence or the county in which the person's mother resided at the time of the person's birth. If the person is a minor the application shall be signed by either parent or the person's guardian. (A) An application to correct a birth record shall set forth all of the available facts required on a birth record and the reasons for making the application, and shall be verified by the applicant. Upon the filing of the application the court may fix a date for a hearing, which shall not be less than seven days after the filing date. The court may require one publication of notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least seven days prior to the date of the hearing. The application shall be supported by the affidavit of the physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse-midwife in attendance. If an affidavit is not available, the application shall be supported by the affidavits of at least two persons having knowledge of the facts stated in the application, by documentary evidence, or by other evidence the court deems sufficient. The probate judge, if satisfied that the facts are as stated, shall make an order correcting the birth record, except that in the case of an application to correct the date of birth, the judge shall make the order only if any date shown as the date the attending physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse-midwife signed the birth record or the date the local registrar filed the record is consistent with the corrected date of birth. If supported by sufficient evidence, the judge may include in an order correcting the date of birth an order correcting the date the attending physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse-midwife signed the birth record or the date the local registrar filed the record. (B) An application of a person whose registration of birth is not recorded, or has been lost or destroyed, must comply with division (A) of this section. Upon the filing of the application the court may fix a date for a hearing, which shall be not less than seven days after the filing date. The court may require one publication of notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least seven days prior to the date of the hearing. The probate judge, or a special master commissioner, shall personally examine the applicant in open court and shall take sworn testimony on the application which shall include the testimony of at least two credible witnesses, or clear and convincing documentary evidence. The probate court may conduct any necessary investigation, and shall permit the applicant and all witnesses presented to be cross-examined by any interested person, or by the prosecuting attorney of the county. When a witness or the applicant is unable to appear in open court, the court may authorize the taking of the witness's or applicant's deposition. The court may cause a complete record to be taken of the hearing, shall file it with the other papers in the case, and may order the transcript of the testimony to be filed and made a matter of record in the court. Upon being satisfied that notice of the hearing on the application has been given by publication, if required, and that the claim of the applicant is true, the court shall make a finding upon all the facts required on a birth record, and shall order the registration of the birth of the applicant. The court shall forthwith transmit to the director of health a certified summary of its finding and order, on a form prescribed by the director, who shall file it in the records of the central division of vital statistics. (C) The director may forward a copy of the summary for the registration of a birth in the director's office to the appropriate local registrar of vital statistics. A certified copy of the birth record corrected or registered by court order as provided in this section shall have the same legal effect for all purposes as an original birth record. The application, affidavits, findings, and orders of the court, together with a transcript of the testimony if ordered by the court, for the correction of a birth record or for the registration of a birth, shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose and shall be properly indexed. The book shall become a part of the records of the probate court. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, whenever a correction is ordered in a birth record under division (A) of this section, the court ordering the correction shall forthwith forward to the department of health a certified copy of the order containing such information as will enable the department to prepare a new birth record. Thereupon, the department shall record a new birth record using the correct information supplied by the court and the new birth record shall have the same overall appearance as the original record which would have been issued under this chapter. Where handwriting is required to effect that appearance, the department shall supply it. Upon the preparation and filing of the new birth record, the original birth record and index references shall cease to be a public record. The original record and all other information pertaining to it shall be placed in an envelope which shall be sealed by the department, and its contents shall not be open to inspection or copy unless so ordered by the probate court of the county that ordered the correction. The department shall promptly forward a copy of the new birth record to the local registrar of vital statistics of the district in which the birth occurred and the local registrar shall file a copy of the new birth record along with and in the same manner as the other copies of birth records in the local registrar's possession. All copies of the original birth record, as well as any and all other papers, documents, and index references pertaining to it, in the possession of the local registrar shall be destroyed. The probate court shall retain permanently in the file of its proceedings such information as will enable the court to identify both the original birth record and the new birth record. The new birth record, as well as any certified copies of it when properly authenticated by a duly authorized person, shall be prima-facie evidence in all courts and places of the facts therein stated. (2) If the correction ordered in the birth record under division (A) of this section involves a change in the date of birth of the applicant and the department of health determines that the corrected date of birth is inconsistent with the date shown as the date the attending physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse-midwife signed the birth record or the date the local registrar filed the record, the department shall request that the court reconsider the order and, if appropriate, make a new order in which the dates are consistent. If the court does not make a new order within a reasonable time, instead of issuing a new birth record, the department shall file and record the court's order in the same manner as other birth records and make a cross-reference on the original and on the corrected record. (E) The probate court shall assess costs of registering a birth or correcting a birth record under this section against the person who makes application for the registration or correction. Sec. 3705.16. (A) For purposes of this section notwithstanding section 3705.01 of the Revised Code, "fetal death" does not include death of the product of human conception prior to twenty weeks of gestation. (B) Each death or fetal death that occurs in this state shall be registered with the local registrar of vital statistics of the district in which the death or fetal death occurred, by the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains. The personal and statistical information in the death or fetal death certificate shall be obtained from the best qualified persons or sources available, by the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains. The statement of facts relating to the disposition of the body and information relative to the armed services referred to in section 3705.19 of the Revised Code shall be signed by the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains. (C)(1) For certification of the cause of death, the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains shall present the death or fetal death certificate to one of the following individuals: (a) If a death or fetal death occurs under any circumstance described in section 313.12 of the Revised Code, the coroner in the county in which the death occurs or the medical examiner; (b) If a death or fetal death occurs under a circumstance other than as described in section 313.12 of the Revised Code, the attending physician or physician assistant of the decedent, except that, in the case of decedent who did not have an attending physician or physician assistant, the physician or physician assistant who, either in person or through a means of telehealth, last examined or treated the decedent for any illness or condition. (2) After the death or fetal death certificate is presented, the cause of death shall be certified and the medical certificate of death shall be completed and signed as follows: (a) If the death or fetal death certificate is presented to the coroner or medical examiner, the coroner, shall certify the cause of death or a deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner serving in an a capacity equivalent capacity, to the coroner shall certify the cause of death. (b) If the death or fetal death certificate is presented to the physician or physician assistant described in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, that physician or physician assistant shall certify the cause of death. (3) The medical certificate of death shall be completed and signed by the coroner or medical examiner, physician or physician assistant who attended the decedent, or physician or physician assistant who last examined or treated the decedent, as appropriate, within forty-eight hours after notification of the death or fetal death. A coroner or medical examiner may satisfy the requirement of signing a medical certificate showing the cause of death or fetal death as pending by signing it within forty-eight hours after notification of the death or fetal death, provided that the coroner or medical examiner shall sign any other medical certificate of death or supplementary medical certification within forty-eight hours after the cause of death has been determined. A physician or physician assistant described in division (C)(1)(b) of this section may satisfy the requirement of signing a medical certificate by signing with an electronic signature. (D) A coroner, medical examiner, or physician, or physician assistant who acts in good faith in accordance with this section, without fraud or malice, and upon reasonable belief of the cause of death or fetal death based on the information, if any, presented is not subject to civil liability or professional disciplinary action for any act or omission in certifying the cause of death or in completing and signing the medical certificate of death. (E) Any death certificate registered pursuant to this section shall contain the social security number of the decedent, if available. A social security number obtained under this section is a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3705.17. The body of a person whose death occurs in this state shall not be interred, deposited in a vault or tomb, cremated, or otherwise disposed of by a funeral director until a burial permit is issued by a local registrar or sub-registrar of vital statistics. No such permit shall be issued by a local registrar or sub-registrar until a satisfactory death, fetal death, or provisional death certificate is filed with the local registrar or sub-registrar. When the medical certification as to the cause of death cannot be provided by the attending physician or physician assistant or by the coroner prior to burial, for sufficient cause, as determined by rule of the director of health, the funeral director may file a provisional death certificate with the local registrar or sub-registrar for the purpose of securing a burial or burial-transit permit. When the funeral director files a provisional death certificate to secure a burial or burial-transit permit, the funeral director shall file a satisfactory and complete death certificate within five days after the date of death. The director of health, by rule, may provide additional time for filing a satisfactory death certificate. A burial permit authorizing cremation shall not be issued upon the filing of a provisional certificate of death. When a funeral director or other person obtains a burial permit from a local registrar or sub-registrar, the registrar or sub-registrar shall charge a fee of ten dollars for the issuance of the burial permit. Nine dollars and fifty cents of each fee collected for a burial permit shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the cemetery registration fund created under section 4767.03 of the Revised Code to be used by the division of real estate and professional licensing in the department of commerce in discharging its duties prescribed in Chapter 4767. of the Revised Code and the Ohio cemetery dispute resolution commission created by section 4767.05 of the Revised Code. A local registrar or sub-registrar shall transmit payments of that portion of the amount of each fee collected under this section to the treasurer of state on a quarterly basis or more frequently, if possible. The director of health, by rule, shall provide for the issuance of a burial permit without the payment of the fee required by this section if the total cost of the burial will be paid by an agency or instrumentality of the United States, the state or a state agency, or a political subdivision of the state. The director of commerce may by rule adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code reduce the total amount of the fee required by this section and that portion of the amount of the fee required to be paid to the credit of the division of real estate and professional licensing for the use of the division and the Ohio cemetery dispute resolution commission, if the director determines that the total amount of funds the fee is generating at the amount required by this section exceeds the amount of funds the division of real estate and professional licensing and the commission need to carry out their powers and duties prescribed in Chapter 4767. of the Revised Code. No person in charge of any premises in which interments or cremations are made shall inter or cremate or otherwise dispose of a body, unless it is accompanied by a burial permit. Each person in charge of a cemetery, crematory, or other place of disposal shall indorse upon a burial permit the date of interment, cremation, or other disposal and shall retain such permits for a period of at least five years. The person in charge shall keep an accurate record of all interments, cremations, or other disposal of dead bodies, made in the premises under the person's charge, stating the name of the deceased person, place of death, date of burial, cremation, or other disposal, and name and address of the funeral director. Such record shall at all times be open to public inspection. Sec. 3705.22. Whenever it is alleged that the facts stated in any birth, fetal death, or death record filed in the department of health are not true, the director may require satisfactory evidence to be presented in the form of affidavits, amended records, or certificates to establish the alleged facts. When established, the original record or certificate shall be supplemented by the affidavit or the amended certificate or record information. An affidavit in a form prescribed by the director shall be sworn to by a person having personal knowledge of the matter sought to be corrected. Medical certifications contained on fetal death or death records may be corrected only by the person whose name appears on the original record as attending physician or physician assistant or by the coroner of the county in which the death occurred. The amended birth record shall be signed by the person who attended the birth and the informant or informants whose names appear on the original record. The amended death or fetal death record shall be signed by the following persons whose names appear on the original record: the physician, physician assistant, or coroner,; the funeral director,; and the informant whose names appear on the original record. An affidavit or amended record for the correction of the given name of a person shall have the signature of the person, if the person is age eighteen or older, or of both parents if the person is under eighteen, except that in the case of a child born out of wedlock, the mother's signature will suffice; in the case of the death or incapacity of either parent, the signature of the other parent will suffice; in the case of a child not in the custody of histhe child's parents, the signature of the guardian or agency having the custody of the child will suffice; and in the case of a child whose parents are deceased, the signature of another person who knows the child will suffice. Once a correction or amendment of an item is made on a vital record, that item shall not be corrected or amended again except on the order of a court of this state or the request of a court of another state or jurisdiction. The director may refuse to accept an affidavit or amended certificate or record that appears to be submitted for the purpose of falsifying the certificate or record. A certified copy of a certificate or record issued by the department of health shall show the information as originally given and the corrected information, except that an electronically produced copy need indicate only that the certificate or record was corrected and the item that was corrected. Sec. 3705.29. (A) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Purposely make any false statement in a certificate, record, or report required by this chapter or in an application or amendment of it, or purposely supply false information with the intent that that information be used in the preparation of any such report, record, or certificate, or amendment of it; (2) Without lawful authority and with intent to deceive, counterfeit, alter, amend, or mutilate any certificate, record, or report required by this chapter or any certified copy of it; (3) Purposely obtain, possess, use, sell, furnish, or attempt to obtain, possess, use, sell, or furnish to another for the purpose of deception any certificate, record, or report required by this chapter or any certified copy of it, or any certificate, record, or report that is counterfeit, altered, or amended or false in whole or part; (4) Purposely obtain, possess, use, sell, furnish, or attempt to obtain, possess, use, sell, or furnish to another for the purpose of deception any certificate, record, or report required by this chapter, or any certified copy of it, that relates to the birth of another person, whether living or dead; (5) Without lawful authority, possess any certificate, record, or report required by this chapter or any copy of such a certificate, record, or report, knowing it to have been stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained. (B) No person employed by the office of vital statistics or a local registrar shall purposely furnish or possess a birth record or certified copy of a birth record with intent that it be used for deception. (C) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Purposely refuse to provide information required by this chapter or rules adopted under it; (2) Purposely transport out of this state or accept for interment or other disposition a dead body without a permit required by this chapter; (3) Knowingly prepare, issue, sell, or give any record or certificate that is alleged to be an original vital record or a certified copy of a vital record if the person knows or has reason to know that it is not an original vital record or a certified copy of a vital record; (4) Refuse to comply with the requirements of this chapter or violate any of the provisions of this chapter. (D) No officer or employee of the department of health shall knowingly reveal or provide any information contained in an adoption file maintained by the department under section 3705.12, 3705.121, 3705.122, 3705.123, or 3705.124 of the Revised Code to any person, or knowingly reveal or provide the contents of an adoption file to any person, unless authorized to do so by section 3705.126 of the Revised Code. (E) If a death, or a fetal death of at least twenty weeks of gestation, occurs under any circumstances mentioned in section 313.12 of the Revised Code, the coroner of the county in which the death or fetal death occurs, or a deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner serving in an equivalent capacity, shall certify the cause of that death unless the death was reported to the coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner and that person, after a preliminary examination, declined to assert jurisdiction with respect to the death or fetal deathNo person shall knowingly certify a decedent's cause of death or complete the associated medical certificate of death without being authorized to do so under division (C) of section 3705.16 of the Revised Code. (F) No physician other than the coroner in the county in which a death, or a fetal death of at least twenty weeks of gestation, occurs, or a deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner serving in an equivalent capacity, may certify any death or fetal death that occurs under any circumstances other than natural. (G) If a death, or a fetal death of at least twenty weeks of gestation, occurs under any circumstances mentioned in section 313.12 of the Revised Code, no person shall knowingly present a death or fetal death certificate for the purpose of obtaining certification of the cause of death or completion of the associated medical certification of death to any physician other than the coroner in the county in which the death or fetal death occurred, or to a deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner serving in an equivalent capacity, unless that death or fetal death was reported to the coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner and that person, after a preliminary examination, declined to assert jurisdiction with respect to the death or fetal deathperson who is not authorized to do so under division (C) of section 3705.16 of the Revised Code. (H)(G) No person, with intent to defraud or knowing that the person is facilitating a fraud, shall do either of the following: (1) Certify a cause of death in violation of the prohibition of division (E) or (F) of this section; (2) Obtain or attempt to obtain a certification of the cause of a death or fetal death in violation of the prohibition of division (G)(F) of this section. Sec. 3705.30. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Certified nurse-midwife," "clinical nurse specialist," and "certified nurse practitioner" have the same meanings as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Freestanding birthing center" has the same meaning as in section 3701.503 of the Revised Code. (3)(2) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 3722.01 means an institution or facility licensed under Chapter 3722. of the Revised Code. (4) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (B) The director of health shall establish and, if funds for this purpose are available, implement a statewide birth defects information system for the collection of information concerning congenital anomalies, stillbirths, and abnormal conditions of newborns. (C) If the system is implemented under division (B) of this section, all of the following apply: (1) The director may require each physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse practitioner, hospital, and freestanding birthing center to report to the system information concerning all patients under five years of age with a primary diagnosis of a congenital anomaly or abnormal condition. The director shall not require a hospital, freestanding birthing center, physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner to report to the system any information that is reported to the director or department of health under another provision of the Revised Code or Administrative Code. (2) On request, each physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse practitioner, hospital, and freestanding birthing center shall give the director or authorized employees of the department of health access to the medical records of any patient described in division (C)(1) of this section. The department shall pay the costs of copying any medical records pursuant to this division. (3) The director may review vital statistics records and shall consider expanding the list of congenital anomalies and abnormal conditions of newborns reported on birth certificates pursuant to section 3705.08 of the Revised Code. (D) A physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse practitioner, hospital, or freestanding birthing center that provides information to the system under division (C) of this section shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability for providing the information. Sec. 3705.33. As used in this section, "local health department" means a health department operated by the board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health under section 3709.05 of the Revised Code. A child's parent or legal guardian who wants information concerning the child removed from the birth defects information system shall request from the local health department or the child's physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner a form prepared by the director of health. On request, a local health department, physician, physician assistant, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner shall provide the form to the child's parent or legal guardian. The individual providing the form shall discuss with the child's parent or legal guardian the information contained in the system. If the child's parent or legal guardian signs the form, the department, physician, physician assistant, or nurse shall forward it to the director. On receipt of the signed form, the director shall remove from the system any information that identifies the child. Sec. 3705.35. Not later than one hundred eighty days after October 5, 2000, the The director of health shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to do all of the following: (A) Implement the birth defects information system; (B) Specify the types of congenital anomalies and abnormal conditions of newborns to be reported to the system under section 3705.30 of the Revised Code; (C) Establish reporting requirements for information concerning diagnosed congenital anomalies and abnormal conditions of newborns; (D) Establish standards that must be met by persons or government entities that seek access to the system; (E) Establish a form for use by parents or legal guardians who seek to have information regarding their children removed from the system and a method of distributing the form to local health departments, as defined in section 3705.33 of the Revised Code, and to physicians, physician assistants, certified nurse-midwives, clinical nurse specialists, and certified nurse practitioners. The method of distribution must include making the form available on the internet. Sec. 3705.99. (A) Whoever violates division (A), (B), or (H)(G) of section 3705.29 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars or incarcerated for a term of not more than five years, or both. (B) Whoever violates division (C), (E), or (F), or (G) of section 3705.29 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars or incarcerated for a term of not more than one year, or both. (C) Whoever violates division (D) of section 3705.29 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. Sec. 3715.50. (A) As used in this section and in sections 3715.501 to 3715.505 of the Revised Code: (1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an individual who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner. (2) "Overdose reversal drug" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Pharmacist" means an individual licensed under Chapter 4729. of the Revised Code to practice as a pharmacist. (4) "Pharmacy intern" means an individual licensed under Chapter 4729. of the Revised Code to practice as a pharmacy intern. (5) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery. (6) "Physician assistant" means an individual who is licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code. (7) "Certified mental health assistant" means an individual who is licensed under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority. (B) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, any person or government entity may purchase, possess, distribute, dispense, personally furnish, sell, or otherwise obtain or provide an overdose reversal drug, which includes any instrument or device used to administer the drug, if all of the following conditions are met: (1) The overdose reversal drug is in its original manufacturer's packaging. (2) The overdose reversal drug's packaging contains the manufacturer's instructions for use. (3) The overdose reversal drug is stored in accordance with the manufacturer's or distributor's instructions. (C) In addition to actions authorized by division (B) of this section, any person or government entity may obtain and maintain a supply of an overdose reversal drug for either or both of the following purposes: for use in an emergency situation and for distribution through an automated mechanism. (1) In the case of a supply of an overdose reversal drug obtained and maintained for use in an emergency situation, a person or government entity shall do all of the following: (a) Provide to any individual who accesses the supply instructions regarding emergency administration of the drug, including a specific instruction to summon emergency services as necessary; (b) Establish a process for replacing within a reasonable time period any overdose reversal drug that has been accessed; (c) Store the overdose reversal drug in accordance with the manufacturer's or distributor's instructions. (2) In the case of a supply of an overdose reversal drug obtained and maintained for distribution through an automated mechanism, a person or government entity shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that the mechanism is securely fastened to a permanent structure or is of an appropriate size and weight to reasonably prevent it from being removed from its intended location; (b) Provide to any individual who accesses the supply instructions regarding emergency administration of the drug, including a specific instruction to summon emergency services as necessary; (c) Develop a process for monitoring and replenishing the supply maintained in the automated mechanism; (d) Store the overdose reversal drug in accordance with the manufacturer's or distributor's instructions. (D) If the authority granted by division (B) or (C) of this section is exercised in good faith, the following immunities apply: (1) The person or government entity exercising the authority is not subject to administrative action or criminal prosecution and is not liable for damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property for an act or omission that arises from exercising that authority. (2) After an overdose reversal drug has been dispensed or personally furnished, the person or government entity is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any act or omission of the individual to whom the drug is dispensed or personally furnished: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. (E)(1) This section does not affect any other authority to issue a prescription for, or personally furnish a supply of, an overdose reversal drug. (2) This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a person or government entity may be entitled to under section 9.86, Chapter 2744., section 4765.49, or any other provision of the Revised Code or the common law of this state. Sec. 3719.06. (A)(1) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, if acting in the course of professional practice, in accordance with the laws regulating the professional's practice, and in accordance with rules adopted by the state board of pharmacy, may, except as provided in division (A)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, do the following: (a) Prescribe schedule II, III, IV, and V controlled substances; (b) Administer or personally furnish to patients schedule II, III, IV, and V controlled substances; (c) Cause schedule II, III, IV, and V controlled substances to be administered under the prescriber's direction and supervision. (2) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs who is a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner is subject to both of the following: (a) A schedule II controlled substance may be prescribed only in accordance with division (C) of section 4723.481 of the Revised Code. (b) No schedule II controlled substance shall be personally furnished to any patient. (3) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs who is a physician assistant is subject to all both of the following: (a) A controlled substance may be prescribed or personally furnished only if it is included in the physician-delegated prescriptive authority granted to the physician assistant in accordance with Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (b) A schedule II controlled substance may be prescribed only in accordance with division (B)(4) of section sections 4730.41 and section 4730.411 of the Revised Code. (c)(b) No schedule II controlled substance shall be personally furnished to any patient. (4) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs who is a certified mental health assistant is subject to both of the following: (a) A controlled substance may be prescribed or personally furnished only in accordance with sections 4772.12 and 4772.13 of the Revised Code. (b) No schedule II controlled substance shall be personally furnished to any patient. (B) No licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs shall prescribe, administer, or personally furnish a schedule III anabolic steroid for the purpose of human muscle building or enhancing human athletic performance and no pharmacist shall dispense a schedule III anabolic steroid for either purpose, unless it has been approved for that purpose under the "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended. (C) When issuing a prescription for a schedule II controlled substance, a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs shall do so only upon an electronic prescription, except that the prescriber may issue a written prescription if any of the following apply: (1) A temporary technical, electrical, or broadband failure occurs preventing the prescriber from issuing an electronic prescription. (2) The prescription is issued for a nursing home resident or hospice care patient. (3) The prescriber is employed by or under contract with the same entity that operates the pharmacy. (4) The prescriber determines that an electronic prescription cannot be issued in a timely manner and the patient's medical condition is at risk. (5) The prescriber issues the prescription from a health care facility, which may include an emergency department, and reasonably determines that an electronic prescription would be impractical for the patient or would cause a delay that may adversely impact the patient's medical condition. (6) The prescriber issues per year not more than fifty prescriptions for schedule II controlled substances. (7) The prescriber is a veterinarian licensed under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code. (D) Each written or electronic prescription for a controlled substance shall be properly executed, dated, and signed by the prescriber on the day when issued and shall bear the full name and address of the person for whom, or the owner of the animal for which, the controlled substance is prescribed and the full name, address, and registry number under the federal drug abuse control laws of the prescriber. If the prescription is for an animal, it shall state the species of the animal for which the controlled substance is prescribed. Sec. 3719.064. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Medication-assisted treatment" has the same meaning as in section 340.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Prescriber" means any of the following: (a) An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code and is designated as a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner; (b) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (c) A physician assistant who is licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code; (d) A certified mental health assistant who is licensed under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority by the physician supervising the certified mental health assistant. (3) "Qualifying practitioner" has the same meaning as in section 303(g)(2)(G)(iii) of the "Controlled Substances Act of 1970," 21 U.S.C. 823(g)(2)(G)(iii), as amended. (B) Before initiating medication-assisted treatment, a prescriber shall give the patient or the patient's representative information about all drugs approved by the United States food and drug administration for use in medication-assisted treatment. The information must be provided both orally and in writing. The prescriber or the prescriber's delegate shall note in the patient's medical record when this information was provided and make the record available to employees of the board of nursing or state medical board on their request. If the prescriber is not a qualifying practitioner and the patient's choice is opioid treatment and the prescriber determines that such treatment is clinically appropriate and meets generally accepted standards of medicine, the prescriber shall do one of the following: provide the treatment, refer the patient to another prescriber who will provide the treatment, or refer the patient to an opioid treatment program licensed under section 5119.37 of the Revised Code or a qualifying practitioner. The In the case of a patient's referral, the prescriber or the prescriber's delegate shall make a notation in the patient's medical record naming the prescriber or program or practitioner to whom which the patient was referred and specifying when the referral was made. Sec. 3727.06. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Clinical nurse specialist," certified nurse-midwife," and "certified nurse practitioner" have the same meanings as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Doctor" means an individual authorized to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (2)(3) "Physician assistant" means an individual licensed to practice as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (4) "Podiatrist" means an individual authorized to practice podiatric medicine and surgery. (B)(1)(B) Only the following may admit a patient to a hospital: (a)(1) A doctor who is a member of the hospital's medical staff; (b)(2) A dentist who is a member of the hospital's medical staff; (c)(3) A podiatrist who is a member of the hospital's medical staff; (d)(4) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner if all of the following conditions are met: (i)(a) The clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner has a standard care arrangement entered into pursuant to section 4723.431 of the Revised Code with a collaborating doctor or podiatrist who is a member of the medical staff; (ii)(b) The patient will be under the medical supervision of the collaborating doctor or podiatrist; (iii)(c) Prior to admitting the patient, the clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner notifies the collaborating doctor or podiatrist of the planned admission; (d) The hospital has granted the clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner admitting privileges and appropriate credentials. (e)(5) A physician assistant if all of the following conditions are met: (i)(a) The physician assistant is listed on has a supervision collaboration agreement entered into under section 4730.19 4730.09 of the Revised Code for with a collaborating doctor or podiatrist who is a member of the hospital's medical staff. (ii)(b) The patient will be under the medical supervision of the supervising collaborating doctor or podiatrist. (iii) (c) Prior to admitting the patient, the physician assistant notifies the collaborating doctor or podiatrist of the planned admission. (d) The hospital has granted the physician assistant admitting privileges and appropriate credentials. (2) Prior to admitting a patient, a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, certified nurse practitioner, or physician assistant shall notify the collaborating or supervising doctor or podiatrist of the planned admission. (C) All hospital patients shall be under the medical supervision of a doctor, except that services that may be rendered by a licensed dentist pursuant to Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code provided to patients admitted solely for the purpose of receiving such services shall be under the supervision of the admitting dentist and that services that may be rendered by a podiatrist pursuant to section 4731.51 of the Revised Code provided to patients admitted solely for the purpose of receiving such services shall be under the supervision of the admitting podiatrist. If treatment not within the scope of Chapter 4715. or section 4731.51 of the Revised Code is required at the time of admission by a dentist or podiatrist, or becomes necessary during the course of hospital treatment by a dentist or podiatrist, such treatment shall be under the supervision of a doctor who is a member of the medical staff. It shall be the responsibility of the admitting dentist or podiatrist to make arrangements with a doctor who is a member of the medical staff to be responsible for the patient's treatment outside the scope of Chapter 4715. or section 4731.51 of the Revised Code when necessary during the patient's stay in the hospital. Sec. 3727.70. As used in this section and sections 3727.71 to 3727.79 of the Revised Code: (A) "Admission" means a patient's admission to a hospital on an inpatient basis by a health care professional specified in division (B)(1)(B) of section 3727.06 of the Revised Code. (B) "After-care" means assistance provided by a lay caregiver to a patient in the patient's residence after the patient's discharge and includes only the caregiving needs of the patient at the time of discharge. (C) "Discharge" means the discharge or release of a patient who has been admitted to a hospital on an inpatient basis from the hospital directly to the patient's residence. "Discharge" does not include the transfer of a patient to another facility or setting. (D) "Discharging health care professional" means a health care professional who is authorized by division (B)(1)(B) of section 3727.06 of the Revised Code to admit a patient to a hospital and who has assumed responsibility for directing the creation of the patient's discharge plan under section 3727.75 of the Revised Code. (E) "Guardian" has the same meaning as in section 2133.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Lay caregiver" means an adult designated under section 3727.71 of the Revised Code to provide after-care to a patient. (G) "Lay caregiver designation" means the designation of a lay caregiver for a patient as described in section 3727.71 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) "Patient's residence" means either of the following: (a) The dwelling that a patient or the patient's guardian considers to be the patient's home; (b) The dwelling of a relative or other individual who has agreed to temporarily house the patient following discharge and who has communicated this fact to hospital staff. (2) "Patient's residence" does not include any of the following: (a) A hospital; (b) A nursing home, residential care facility, county home, or district home, as defined in section 3721.01 of the Revised Code; (c) A veterans' home operated under Chapter 5907. of the Revised Code; (d) A residential facility, as defined in section 5119.34 of the Revised Code; (e) A residential facility, as defined in section 5123.19 of the Revised Code; (f) A hospice care program, as defined in section 3712.01 of the Revised Code; (g) A freestanding inpatient rehabilitation facility licensed under section 3702.30 of the Revised Code; (h) Another facility similar to one specified in this division. Sec. 3728.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Administer epinephrine" means to inject an individual with epinephrine using an autoinjector in a manufactured dosage form. (B) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code and also includes a sheriff. (C) "Prescriber" means an individual who is authorized by law to prescribe drugs or dangerous drugs or drug therapy related devices in the course of the individual's professional practice, including only the following: (1) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner who holds a certificate to prescribe issued under section 4723.48 of the Revised Code; (2) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; (3) A physician assistant who is licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code. (D) "Qualified entity" means either of the following: (1) Any public or private entity that is associated with a location where allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present, including child care centers, colleges and universities, places of employment, restaurants, amusement parks, recreation camps, sports playing fields and arenas, and other similar locations, except that "qualified entity" does not include either of the following: (a) A chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; community school; science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school; college-preparatory boarding school; or a school operated by the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, as those entities are otherwise authorized to procure epinephrine autoinjectors pursuant to sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, or 3328.29 of the Revised Code; (b) A camp described in section 5180.26 of the Revised Code that is authorized to procure epinephrine autoinjectors pursuant to that section; (2) Either of the following served by a peace officer: a law enforcement agency or other entity described in division (A) of section 109.71 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3902.65. (A) As used in this section, "physician assistant" means an individual who is licensed to practice as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (B) A health plan issuer shall provide payment or reimbursement to a physician assistant for providing a health care service to a patient in the same manner that it provides payment or reimbursement to any other health care provider for providing a health care service that is the equivalent of the health care service provided by the physician assistant, as long as the covered person's health benefit plan includes coverage of that type of health care service. Sec. 4723.36. (A) A certified nurse-midwife, certified nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist may determine and pronounce an individual's death. (B)(1)(B) A registered nurse who is not described in division (A) of this section may determine and pronounce an individual's death, but only if the individual's respiratory and circulatory functions are not being artificially sustained and, at the time the determination and pronouncement of death is made, the registered nurse is providing or supervising the individual's care through a hospice care program licensed under Chapter 3712. of the Revised Code or any other entity that provides palliative care. (2)(C) A registered nurse who determines and pronounces an individual's death under division (B)(1)(A) or (B) of this section shall comply with both of the following: (a)(1) The nurse shall not complete any portion of the individual's death certificate. (b)(2) The nurse shall notify the individual's attending physician, certified nurse-midwife, certified nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist or physician assistant of the determination and pronouncement of death in order for the physician, certified nurse-midwife, certified nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist or physician assistant to fulfill the physician's, certified nurse-midwife's, certified nurse practitioner's, or clinical nurse specialist's or physician assistant's duties under section 3705.16 of the Revised Code. The nurse shall provide the notification within a period of time that is reasonable but not later than twenty-four hours following the determination and pronouncement of the individual's death. Sec. 4725.27. The testimony and reports of an optometrist licensed by the state vision professionals board under this chapter shall be received by any state, county, municipal, school district, or other public board, body, agency, institution, or official and by any private educational or other institution receiving public funds as competent evidence with respect to any matter within the scope of the practice of optometry. No such board, body, agency, official, or institution shall interfere with any individual's right to a free choice of receiving services from either an optometrist or a , physician, or physician assistant. No such board, body, agency, official, or institution shall discriminate against an optometrist performing procedures that are included in the practice of optometry as provided in section 4725.01 of the Revised Code if the optometrist is licensed under this chapter to perform those procedures. Sec. 4725.40. As used in sections 4725.40 to 4725.59 of the Revised Code: (A) "Optical aid" means both of the following: (1) Spectacles or other instruments or devices that are not contact lenses, if the spectacles or other instruments or devices may aid or correct human vision and have been prescribed by a physician or optometrist licensed by any state; (2) Contact lenses, regardless of whether they address visual function, if they are designed to fit over the cornea of the eye or are otherwise designed for use in or on the eye or orbit. All contact lenses shall be dispensed only in accordance with a valid written prescription designated for contact lenses, including the following: (a) Zero-powered plano contact lenses; (b) Cosmetic contact lenses; (c) Performance-enhancing contact lenses; (d) Any other contact devices determined by the state vision professionals board to be contact lenses. (B) "Optical dispensing" means interpreting but not altering a prescription of a licensed physician or optometrist and designing, adapting, fitting, or replacing the prescribed optical aids, pursuant to such prescription, to or for the intended wearer; duplicating lenses, other than contact lenses, accurately as to power without a prescription; and duplicating nonprescription eyewear and parts of eyewear. "Optical dispensing" does not include selecting frames, placing an order for the delivery of an optical aid, transacting a sale, transferring an optical aid to the wearer after an optician has completed fitting it, or providing instruction in the general care and use of an optical aid, including placement, removal, hygiene, or cleaning. (C) "Licensed dispensing optician" means a person holding a current, valid license issued under sections 4725.48 to 4725.51 of the Revised Code that authorizes the person to engage in optical dispensing. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit a licensed dispensing optician to alter the specifications of a prescription. (D) "Licensed spectacle dispensing optician" means a licensed dispensing optician authorized to engage in both of the following: (1) The dispensing of optical aids other than contact lenses; (2) The dispensing of prepackaged soft contact lenses in accordance with section 4725.411 of the Revised Code. (E) "Licensed spectacle-contact lens dispensing optician" means a licensed dispensing optician authorized to engage in the dispensing of any optical aid. (F) "Apprentice" means any person dispensing optical aids under the direct supervision of a licensed dispensing optician. (G) "Prescription" means the written or verbal directions or instructions as specified by a physician or optometrist licensed by any state for preparing an optical aid for a patient, as those directions or instructions are specified by any of the following who are licensed by any state: an optometrist, physician, or physician assistant. (H) "Supervision" means the provision of direction and control through personal inspection and evaluation of work. Sec. 4725.53. (A) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the state vision professionals board, by a majority vote of its members, may refuse to grant a license and, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may suspend or revoke the license of a licensed dispensing optician or impose a fine or order restitution pursuant to division (B) of this section on any of the following grounds: (1) Conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude or a disqualifying offense as those terms are defined in section 4776.10 of the Revised Code; (2) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or deception; (3) Obtaining any fee or making any sale of an optical aid by means of fraud or misrepresentation; (4) Habitual indulgence in the use of controlled substances or other habit-forming drugs, or in the use of alcoholic liquors to an extent that affects professional competency; (5) Finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that the applicant or licensee is incompetent by reason of mental illness and no subsequent finding by the court of competency; (6) Finding by a court of law that the licensee is guilty of incompetence or negligence in the dispensing of optical aids; (7) Knowingly permitting or employing a person whose license has been suspended or revoked or an unlicensed person to engage in optical dispensing; (8) Permitting another person to use the licensee's license; (9) Engaging in optical dispensing not pursuant to the prescription of a licensed physician or licensed optometrist, licensed physician, or licensed physician assistant, but nothing in this section shall prohibit the duplication or replacement of previously prepared optical aids, except contact lenses shall not be duplicated or replaced without a written prescription; (10) Violation of sections 4725.40 to 4725.59 of the Revised Code; (11) Waiving the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers optical dispensing services, would otherwise be required to pay if the waiver is used as an enticement to a patient or group of patients to receive health care services from that provider; (12) Advertising that the licensee will waive the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers optical dispensing services, would otherwise be required to pay; (13) Violating the code of ethical conduct adopted under section 4725.66 of the Revised Code. (B) The board may impose a fine of not more than five hundred dollars for a first occurrence of an action that is grounds for discipline under this section and of not less than five hundred nor more than one thousand dollars for a subsequent occurrence, or may order the licensee to make restitution to a person who has suffered a financial loss as a result of the licensee's failure to comply with sections 4725.40 to 4725.59 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding divisions (A)(11) and (12) of this section, sanctions shall not be imposed against any licensee who waives deductibles and copayments: (1) In compliance with the health benefit plan that expressly allows such a practice. Waiver of the deductibles or copays shall be made only with the full knowledge and consent of the plan purchaser, payer, and third-party administrator. Such consent shall be made available to the board upon request. (2) For professional services rendered to any other person licensed pursuant to this chapter to the extent allowed by this chapter and the rules of the board. (D) The board shall not refuse to grant a license to an applicant because of a conviction unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (E) If a violation described in this section has caused, is causing, or is about to cause substantial and material harm, the board may issue an order requiring that person to cease and desist from engaging in the violation. Notice of the order shall be mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, immediately after its issuance to the person subject to the order and to all persons known to be involved in the violation. The board may thereafter publicize or otherwise make known to all interested parties that the order has been issued. The notice shall specify the particular act, omission, practice, or transaction that is subject to the cease-and-desist order and shall set a date, not more than fifteen days after the date of the order, for a hearing on the continuation or revocation of the order. The person shall comply with the order immediately upon receipt of notice of the order. The board may, on the application of a party and for good cause shown, continue the hearing. Chapter 119. of the Revised Code applies to the hearing to the extent that that chapter does not conflict with the procedures set forth in this section. The board shall, within fifteen days after objections are submitted to the hearing officer's report and recommendation, issue a final order either confirming or revoking the cease-and-desist order. The final order may be appealed as provided under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The remedy under this division is cumulative and concurrent with the other remedies available under this section or section 4725.54 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4725.56. No licensed dispensing optician, or employee or agent of a licensed dispensing optician shall pay or offer to pay a rebate or commission of any nature, or offer any other thing of value, to a licensed physician or licensed optometrist, licensed physician, or licensed physician assistant for referring patients to the licensed dispensing optician. Sec. 4725.59. (A) Sections 4725.40 to 4725.59 of the Revised Code do not apply to: (1) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, or to persons while in the employment and under the supervision of a physician at the physician's office; (2) An optometrist licensed under sections 4725.01 to 4725.34 of the Revised Code, or to persons while in the employment and under the supervision of an optometrist at the optometrist's office; (3) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (B) Nothing in sections 4725.40 to 4725.59 of the Revised Code shall prevent or restrict any individual, firm, or corporation from employing or from engaging in optical dispensing through persons licensed or registered under such sections. Sec. 4729.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Pharmacy," except when used in a context that refers to the practice of pharmacy, means any area, room, rooms, place of business, department, or portion of any of the foregoing where the practice of pharmacy is conducted. (B) "Practice of pharmacy" means providing pharmacist care requiring specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill derived from the principles of biological, chemical, behavioral, social, pharmaceutical, and clinical sciences. As used in this division, "pharmacist care" includes the following: (1) Interpreting prescriptions; (2) Dispensing drugs and drug therapy related devices; (3) Compounding drugs; (4) Counseling individuals with regard to their drug therapy, recommending drug therapy related devices, and assisting in the selection of drugs and appliances for treatment of common diseases and injuries and providing instruction in the proper use of the drugs and appliances; (5) Performing drug regimen reviews with individuals by discussing all of the drugs that the individual is taking and explaining the interactions of the drugs; (6) Performing drug utilization reviews with licensed health professionals authorized to prescribe drugs when the pharmacist determines that an individual with a prescription has a drug regimen that warrants additional discussion with the prescriber; (7) Advising an individual and the health care professionals treating an individual with regard to the individual's drug therapy; (8) Acting pursuant to a consult agreement, if an agreement has been established; (9) Engaging in the administration of immunizations to the extent authorized by section 4729.41 of the Revised Code; (10) Engaging in the administration of drugs to the extent authorized by section 4729.45 of the Revised Code. (C) "Compounding" means the preparation, mixing, assembling, packaging, and labeling of one or more drugs in any of the following circumstances: (1) Pursuant to a prescription issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) Pursuant to the modification of a prescription made in accordance with a consult agreement; (3) As an incident to research, teaching activities, or chemical analysis; (4) In anticipation of orders for drugs pursuant to prescriptions, based on routine, regularly observed dispensing patterns; (5) Pursuant to a request made by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs for a drug that is to be used by the professional for the purpose of direct administration to patients in the course of the professional's practice, if all of the following apply: (a) At the time the request is made, the drug is not commercially available regardless of the reason that the drug is not available, including the absence of a manufacturer for the drug or the lack of a readily available supply of the drug from a manufacturer. (b) A limited quantity of the drug is compounded and provided to the professional. (c) The drug is compounded and provided to the professional as an occasional exception to the normal practice of dispensing drugs pursuant to patient-specific prescriptions. (D) "Consult agreement" means an agreement that has been entered into under section 4729.39 of the Revised Code. (E) "Drug" means: (1) Any article recognized in the United States pharmacopoeia and national formulary, or any supplement to them, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals; (2) Any other article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals; (3) Any article, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or animals; (4) Any article intended for use as a component of any article specified in division (E)(1), (2), or (3) of this section; but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories. "Drug" does not include "hemp" as that term is defined in section 928.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Dangerous drug" means any of the following: (1) Any drug to which either of the following applies: (a) Under the "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, the drug is required to bear a label containing the legend "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription" or "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian" or any similar restrictive statement, or the drug may be dispensed only upon a prescription; (b) Under Chapter 3715. or 3719. of the Revised Code, the drug may be dispensed only upon a prescription. (2) Any drug that contains a schedule V controlled substance and that is exempt from Chapter 3719. of the Revised Code or to which that chapter does not apply; (3) Any drug intended for administration by injection into the human body other than through a natural orifice of the human body; (4) Any drug that is a biological product, as defined in section 3715.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Federal drug abuse control laws" has the same meaning as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (H) "Prescription" means all of the following: (1) A written, electronic, or oral order for drugs or combinations or mixtures of drugs to be used by a particular individual or for treating a particular animal, issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) For purposes of sections 4723.4810, 4729.282, 4730.432, and 4731.93 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug to treat chlamydia, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis issued to and in the name of a patient who is not the intended user of the drug but is the sexual partner of the intended user; (3) For purposes of sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 4723.483, 4729.88, 4730.433, 4731.96, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for an epinephrine autoinjector issued to and in the name of a school, school district, or camp; (4) For purposes of Chapter 3728. and sections 4723.483, 4729.88, 4730.433, and 4731.96 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for an epinephrine autoinjector issued to and in the name of a qualified entity, as defined in section 3728.01 of the Revised Code; (5) For purposes of sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, 4723.4811, 4730.437, 4731.92, and 5180.262 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for injectable or nasally administered glucagon in the name of a school, school district, or camp. (I) "Licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs" or "prescriber" means an individual who is authorized by law to prescribe drugs or dangerous drugs or drug therapy related devices in the course of the individual's professional practice, including only the following: (1) A dentist licensed under Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code; (2) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse; (3) A certified registered nurse anesthetist who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse, but only to the extent of the nurse's authority under section 4723.43 of the Revised Code; (4) An optometrist licensed under Chapter 4725. of the Revised Code to practice optometry; (5) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; (6) A physician assistant who holds a license to practice as a physician assistant issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code; (7) A veterinarian licensed under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code; (8) A certified mental health assistant licensed under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code who has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority by the physician supervising the certified mental health assistant. (J) "Sale" or "sell" includes any transaction made by any person, whether as principal proprietor, agent, or employee, to do or offer to do any of the following: deliver, distribute, broker, exchange, gift or otherwise give away, or transfer, whether the transfer is by passage of title, physical movement, or both. (K) "Wholesale sale" and "sale at wholesale" mean any sale in which the purpose of the purchaser is to resell the article purchased or received by the purchaser. (L) "Retail sale" and "sale at retail" mean any sale other than a wholesale sale or sale at wholesale. (M) "Retail seller" means any person that sells any dangerous drug to consumers without assuming control over and responsibility for its administration. Mere advice or instructions regarding administration do not constitute control or establish responsibility. (N) "Price information" means the price charged for a prescription for a particular drug product and, in an easily understandable manner, all of the following: (1) The proprietary name of the drug product; (2) The established (generic) name of the drug product; (3) The strength of the drug product if the product contains a single active ingredient or if the drug product contains more than one active ingredient and a relevant strength can be associated with the product without indicating each active ingredient. The established name and quantity of each active ingredient are required if such a relevant strength cannot be so associated with a drug product containing more than one ingredient. (4) The dosage form; (5) The price charged for a specific quantity of the drug product. The stated price shall include all charges to the consumer, including, but not limited to, the cost of the drug product, professional fees, handling fees, if any, and a statement identifying professional services routinely furnished by the pharmacy. Any mailing fees and delivery fees may be stated separately without repetition. The information shall not be false or misleading. (O) "Wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs" or "wholesale distributor" means a person engaged in the sale of dangerous drugs at wholesale and includes any agent or employee of such a person authorized by the person to engage in the sale of dangerous drugs at wholesale. (P) "Manufacturer of dangerous drugs" or "manufacturer" means a person, other than a pharmacist or prescriber, who manufactures dangerous drugs and who is engaged in the sale of those dangerous drugs. (Q) "Terminal distributor of dangerous drugs" or "terminal distributor" means a person who is engaged in the sale of dangerous drugs at retail, or any person, other than a manufacturer, repackager, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, wholesale distributor, or pharmacist, who has possession, custody, or control of dangerous drugs for any purpose other than for that person's own use and consumption. "Terminal distributor" includes pharmacies, hospitals, nursing homes, and laboratories and all other persons who procure dangerous drugs for sale or other distribution by or under the supervision of a pharmacist, licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, or other person authorized by the state board of pharmacy. (R) "Promote to the public" means disseminating a representation to the public in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or that is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of a dangerous drug at retail. (S) "Person" includes any individual, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation, the state, any political subdivision of the state, and any district, department, or agency of the state or its political subdivisions. (T)(1) "Animal shelter" means a facility operated by a humane society or any society organized under Chapter 1717. of the Revised Code or a dog pound operated pursuant to Chapter 955. of the Revised Code. (2) "County dog warden" means a dog warden or deputy dog warden appointed or employed under section 955.12 of the Revised Code. (3) "Wild animal rehabilitation facility" means a facility that holds a permit issued by the chief of the division of wildlife for rehabilitation purposes in accordance with section 1533.08 of the Revised Code or rules adopted by the chief. (U) "Food" has the same meaning as in section 3715.01 of the Revised Code. (V) "Pain management clinic" has the same meaning as in section 4731.054 of the Revised Code. (W) "Investigational drug or product" means a drug or product that has successfully completed phase one of the United States food and drug administration clinical trials and remains under clinical trial, but has not been approved for general use by the United States food and drug administration. "Investigational drug or product" does not include controlled substances in schedule I, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (X) "Product," when used in reference to an investigational drug or product, means a biological product, other than a drug, that is made from a natural human, animal, or microorganism source and is intended to treat a disease or medical condition. (Y) "Third-party logistics provider" means a person that provides or coordinates warehousing or other logistics services pertaining to dangerous drugs including distribution, on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale distributor, or terminal distributor of dangerous drugs, but does not take ownership of the drugs or have responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of the drugs. (Z) "Repackager of dangerous drugs" or "repackager" means a person that repacks and relabels dangerous drugs for sale or distribution. (AA) "Outsourcing facility" means a facility that is engaged in the compounding and sale of sterile drugs and is registered as an outsourcing facility with the United States food and drug administration. (BB) "Laboratory" means a laboratory licensed under this chapter as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs and entrusted to have custody of any of the following drugs and to use the drugs for scientific and clinical purposes and for purposes of instruction: dangerous drugs that are not controlled substances, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; dangerous drugs that are controlled substances, as defined in that section; and controlled substances in schedule I, as defined in that section. (CC) "Overdose reversal drug" means both of the following: (1) Naloxone; (2) Any other drug that the state board of pharmacy, through rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, designates as a drug that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the reversal of a known or suspected opioid-related overdose. Sec. 4729.39. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Certified nurse practitioner," "certified nurse-midwife," "clinical nurse specialist," and "standard care arrangement" have the same meanings as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Collaborating physician" means a physician who has entered into a standard care arrangement with a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner. (3) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (4)(3) "Physician assistant" means an individual who is licensed to practice as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code. (5) "Supervising physician" means a physician who has entered into a supervision agreement with a physician assistant under section 4730.19 of the Revised Code. (B) Subject to division (C) of this section, one or more pharmacists may enter into a consult agreement with one or more of the following practitioners: (1) PhysiciansA physician; (2) Physician assistantsA physician assistant, if entering into a consult agreement is authorized by one or more supervising of the collaborating physicians who have entered into a collaboration agreement with the physician assistant under section 4730.09 of the Revised Code; (3) Clinical A clinical nurse specialistsspecialist, certified nurse-midwivesnurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitionerspractitioner, if entering into a consult agreement is authorized by one or more of the collaborating physicians who have entered into a standard care arrangement with the nurse under section 4723.431 of the Revised Code. (C) Before entering into a consult agreement, all of the following conditions must be met: (1) Each practitioner must have an ongoing practitioner-patient relationship with each patient whose drug therapy is to be managed. (2) The diagnosis for which each patient has been prescribed drug therapy must be within the scope of each practitioner's practice. (3) Each pharmacist must have training and experience related to the particular diagnosis for which drug therapy is to be prescribed. (D) With respect to consult agreements, all of the following apply: (1) Under a consult agreement, a pharmacist is authorized to do both of the following, but only to the extent specified in the agreement, this section, and the rules adopted under this section: (a) Manage drug therapy for treatment of specified diagnoses or diseases for each patient who is subject to the agreement, including all of the following: (i) Changing the duration of treatment for the current drug therapy; (ii) Adjusting a drug's strength, dose, dosage form, frequency of administration, or route of administration; (iii) Discontinuing the use of a drug; (iv) Administering a drug; (v) Notwithstanding the definition of "licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs" in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code, adding a drug to the patient's drug therapy. (b)(i) Order laboratory and diagnostic tests, including blood and urine tests, that are related to the drug therapy being managed, and evaluate the results of the tests that are ordered. (ii) A pharmacist's authority to evaluate test results under division (D)(1)(b)(i) of this section does not authorize the pharmacist to make a diagnosis. (2)(a) A consult agreement, or the portion of the agreement that applies to a particular patient, may be terminated by any of the following: (i) A pharmacist who entered into the agreement; (ii) A practitioner who entered into the agreement; (iii) A patient whose drug therapy is being managed; (iv) An individual who consented to the treatment on behalf of a patient or an individual authorized to act on behalf of a patient. (b) The pharmacist or practitioner who receives the notice of a patient's termination of the agreement shall provide written notice to every other pharmacist or practitioner who is a party to the agreement. A pharmacist or practitioner who terminates a consult agreement with regard to one or more patients shall provide written notice to all other pharmacists and practitioners who entered into the agreement and to each individual who consented to treatment under the agreement. The termination of a consult agreement with regard to one or more patients shall be recorded by the pharmacist and practitioner in the medical records of each patient to whom the termination applies. (3) A consult agreement shall be made in writing and shall include all of the following: (a) The diagnoses and diseases being managed under the agreement, including whether each disease is primary or comorbid; (b) A description of the drugs or drug categories the agreement involves; (c) A description of the procedures, decision criteria, and plan the pharmacist is to follow in acting under a consult agreement; (d) A description of how the pharmacist is to comply with divisions (D)(5) and (6) of this section. (4) The content of a consult agreement shall be communicated to each patient whose drug therapy is managed under the agreement. (5) A pharmacist acting under a consult agreement shall maintain a record of each action taken for each patient whose drug therapy is managed under the agreement. (6) Communication between a pharmacist and practitioner acting under a consult agreement shall take place at regular intervals specified by the primary practitioner acting under the agreement. The agreement may include a requirement that a pharmacist send a consult report to each consulting practitioner. (7) A consult agreement is effective for two years and may be renewed if the conditions specified in division (C) of this section continue to be met. (8) A consult agreement does not permit a pharmacist to manage drug therapy prescribed by a practitioner who has not entered into the agreement. (E) The state board of pharmacy, state medical board, and board of nursing shall each adopt rules as follows for its license holders establishing standards and procedures for entering into a consult agreement and managing a patient's drug therapy under a consult agreement: (1) The state board of pharmacy, in consultation with the state medical board and board of nursing, shall adopt rules to be followed by pharmacists. (2) The state medical board, in consultation with the state board of pharmacy, shall adopt rules to be followed by physicians and rules to be followed by physician assistants. (3) The board of nursing, in consultation with the state board of pharmacy and state medical board, shall adopt rules to be followed by clinical nurse specialists, certified nurse-midwives, and certified nurse practitioners. The boards shall specify in the rules any categories of drugs or types of diseases for which a consult agreement may not be established. Each board may adopt any other rules it considers necessary for the implementation and administration of this section. All rules adopted under this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, both of the following apply: (a) A pharmacist acting in accordance with a consult agreement regarding a practitioner's change in a drug for a patient whose drug therapy the pharmacist is managing under the agreement is not liable in damages in a tort or other civil action for injury or loss to person or property allegedly arising from the change. (b) A practitioner acting in accordance with a consult agreement regarding a pharmacist's change in a drug for a patient whose drug therapy the pharmacist is managing under a consult agreement is not liable in damages in a tort or other civil action for injury or loss to person or property allegedly arising from the change unless the practitioner authorized the specific change. (2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not limit a practitioner's or pharmacist's liability in damages in a tort or other civil action for injury or loss to person or property allegedly arising from actions that are not related to the practitioner's or pharmacist's change in a drug for a patient whose drug therapy is being managed under a consult agreement. Sec. 4730.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Physician" means an individual who is authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery. (B) "Health care facility" means any of the following: (1) A hospital registered with licensed by the department of health under section 3701.07 Chapter 3722. of the Revised Code; (2) A health care facility licensed by the department of health under section 3702.30 of the Revised Code; (3) Any other facility designated by the state medical board in rules adopted pursuant to division (B) of section 4730.08 of the Revised Code. (C) "Service""Medical service" or "service" means a medical activity that requires training in the diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of disease. (D) "Prescriptive authority" means the authority to prescribe drugs and therapeutic devices. Sec. 4730.02. Except as provided in sections 4730.021 and 4730.03 of the Revised Code: (A) No person shall hold that person out as being able to function as a physician assistant, or use any words or letters indicating or implying that the person is a physician assistant, without a current, valid license to practice as a physician assistant issued pursuant to this chapter. (B) No person shall practice as a physician assistant without the supervision, control, and direction of a physicianin a manner that is inconsistent with section 4730.08 of the Revised Code. (C) No person shall practice as a physician assistant without having entered into a supervision agreement with a supervising physician under section 4730.19 of the Revised Code. (D) No person acting as the supervising physician of a physician assistant shall authorize the physician assistant to perform services if either of the following is the case: (1) The services are not within the physician's normal course of practice and expertise; (2) The services are inconsistent with the supervision agreement under which the physician assistant is being supervised, including, if applicable, the policies of the health care facility in which the physician and physician assistant are practicing. (E) No person practicing as a physician assistant shall prescribe any drug or device to perform or induce an abortion, or otherwise perform or induce an abortion. (F) No person shall advertise to provide services as a physician assistant, except for the purpose of seeking employment. (G) (D) No person practicing as a physician assistant shall fail to wear at all times when on duty a placard, plate, or other device identifying that person as a "physician assistant." (H) Division (A) of this section does not apply to a person who meets all of the following conditions: (1) The person holds in good standing a valid license or other form of authority to practice as a physician assistant issued by another state. (2) The person is practicing as a volunteer without remuneration during a charitable event that lasts not more than seven days. (3) The medical care provided by the person will be supervised by the medical director of the charitable event or by another physician. When a person meets the conditions of this division, the person shall be deemed to hold, during the course of the charitable event, a license to practice as a physician assistant from the state medical board and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter authorizing the board to take disciplinary action against a license holder. Not less than seven calendar days before the first day of the charitable event, the person or the event's organizer shall notify the board of the person's intent to practice as a physician assistant at the event. During the course of the charitable event, the person's scope of practice is limited to the procedures that a physician assistant licensed under this chapter is authorized to perform unless the person's scope of practice in the other state is more restrictive than in this state. If the latter is the case, the person's scope of practice is limited to the procedures that a physician assistant in the other state may perform. Sec. 4730.021. (A) Division (A) of section 4730.02 of the Revised Code does not apply to a person who meets all of the following conditions: (1) The person holds in good standing a valid license or other form of authority to practice as a physician assistant issued by another state. (2) The person is practicing as a volunteer without remuneration during a charitable event that lasts not more than seven days. (3) The medical care provided by the person will be supervised by the medical director of the charitable event or by another physician. (B) When a person meets the conditions of division (A) of this section, the person shall be deemed to hold, during the course of the charitable event, a license to practice as a physician assistant from the state medical board and is subject to the provisions of this chapter authorizing the board to take disciplinary action against a license holder. Not less than seven calendar days before the first day of the charitable event, the person or the event's organizer shall notify the board of the person's intent to practice as a physician assistant at the event. During the course of the charitable event, the person's scope of practice is limited to the procedures that a physician assistant licensed under this chapter is authorized to perform, unless the person's scope of practice in the other state is more restrictive than in this state. If the latter is the case, the person's scope of practice is limited to the procedures that a physician assistant in the other state may perform. Sec. 4730.03. Nothing in this chapter shall: (A) Be construed to affect or interfere with the performance of duties of any medical personnel who are either of the following: (1) In active service in the army, navy, coast guard, marine corps, air force, public health service, or marine hospital service of the United States, while so serving; (2) Employed by the veterans administration of the United States department of veterans affairs, while so employed. (B) Prevent any person from performing any of the services a physician assistant may be authorized to perform, if the person's professional scope of practice established under any other chapter of the Revised Code authorizes the person to perform the services; (C) Prohibit a physician from delegating responsibilities to any nurse or other qualified person who does not hold a license to practice as a physician assistant, provided that the individual to whom the responsibilities are delegated does not hold the individual out to be a physician assistant; (D) Be construed as authorizing a physician assistant independently to order or direct the execution of procedures or techniques by a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in the care and treatment of a person in any setting, except to the extent that the physician assistant is authorized to do so by a physician who is responsible for supervising the physician assistant and, if applicable, the policies of the health care facility in which the physician assistant is practicingunder the physician assistant's authority to practice as provided in section 4730.08 of the Revised Code; (E) Authorize a physician assistant to engage in the practice of optometry, except to the extent that the physician assistant is authorized by a supervising physician acting in accordance with this chapter to perform routine visual screening, provide medical care prior to or following eye surgery, or assist in the care of diseases of the eye; (F) Be construed as authorizing a physician assistant to prescribe any drug or device to perform or induce an abortion, or as otherwise authorizing a physician assistant to perform or induce an abortion. Sec. 4730.04. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Disaster" means any imminent threat or actual occurrence of widespread or severe damage to or loss of property, personal hardship or injury, or loss of life that results from any natural phenomenon or act of a human. (2) "Emergency" means an occurrence or event that poses an imminent threat to the health or life of a human. (B) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any of the following individuals from providing medical care, to the extent the individual is able, in response to a need for medical care precipitated by a disaster or emergency: (1) An individual who holds a license to practice as a physician assistant issued under this chapter; (2) An individual licensed or authorized to practice as a physician assistant in another state; (3) An individual credentialed or employed as a physician assistant by an agency, office, or other instrumentality of the federal government. (C) For purposes of the medical care provided by a physician assistant pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, both of the following apply notwithstanding any supervision collaboration requirement of this chapter to the contrary: (1) The physician who supervises collaborates with the physician assistant pursuant to a supervision collaboration agreement entered into under section 4730.19 4730.09 of the Revised Code is not required to meet the supervision collaboration requirements established under this chapter. (2) The physician designated as the medical director of the disaster or emergency may supervise collaborate with the physician assistant for purposes of the medical care provided by the physician assistant. Sec. 4730.05. (A) There is hereby created the The physician assistant policy committee of the state medical board is created. The president of the board shall appoint the members of the committee. The Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the committee shall consist of the seven members specified in divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section. When the committee is developing or revising policy and procedures for physician-delegated prescriptive authority for physician assistants, the committee shall include the additional member specified in division (A)(4) of this section.following: (1) Three members of the committee shall be who are physicians. Of the physician members, one shall be a member of the state medical board, one shall be appointed from a list of five physicians recommended by the Ohio state medical association, and one shall be appointed from a list of five physicians recommended by the Ohio osteopathic association. At all times, the physician membership of the committee shall include at least one physician who is a supervising collaborating physician of a physician assistant, preferably with at least two years' experience as a supervising collaborating physician. (2) Three members shall be who are physician assistants. Each member shall be appointed from a list of five individuals recommended by the Ohio association of physician assistants or its successor organization. (3) One member, who is not affiliated with any health care profession, shall be appointed to represent the interests of consumers. (4) One additional member, appointed to serve only when the committee is developing or revising policy and procedures for physician-delegated prescriptive authority for physician assistants, shall be a pharmacist. The member shall be appointed from a list of five clinical pharmacists recommended by the Ohio pharmacists association or appointed from the pharmacist members of the state board of pharmacy, preferably from among the members who are clinical pharmacists. The pharmacist member shall have voting privileges only for purposes of developing or revising policy and procedures for physician-delegated prescriptive authority for physician assistants. Presence of the pharmacist member shall not be required for the transaction of any other business. (B) Terms of office shall be for two years, with each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term that it succeeds. Each Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, each member shall hold office from the date of being appointed until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Members may be reappointed, except that a member may not be appointed to serve more than three consecutive terms. As vacancies occur, a successor shall be appointed who has the qualifications the vacancy requires. A member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which a predecessor was appointed shall hold office as a member for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until a successor takes office or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. (C)(C)(1) With respect to the member described in division (A)(3) of this section, when a vacancy occurs but the board is unable to identify in a timely manner a successor who is acceptable to the board, the board may elect to fill the vacancy by appointing a physician assistant. (2) A member who is absent from three consecutive committee meetings is automatically removed from office. The vacancy shall be filled as provided in division (B) of this section, except that the member who was removed from office may not be reappointed. (D) Each member of the committee shall receive the member's necessary and actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties as a member. (D)(E) The committee members specified in divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section by a majority vote shall elect a member to serve as the committee's chairperson from among those members. The members may elect a new chairperson at any time. (E)(F) The state medical board may appoint assistants, clerical staff, or other employees as necessary for the committee to perform its duties adequately. (F)(G) The committee shall meet as necessary to carry out its responsibilities. (G)(H) The board may permit meetings of the physician assistant policy committee to include the use of interactive videoconferencing, teleconferencing, or both if all of the following requirements are met: (1) The meeting location is open and accessible to the public. (2) Each committee member is permitted to choose whether the member attends in person or through the use of the meeting's videoconferencing or teleconferencing; (3) Any meeting related meeting-related materials available before the meeting are sent to each committee member by electronic mail, facsimile, or United States mail, or are hand delivered. (4) If interactive videoconferencing is used, there is a clear video and audio connection that enables all participants at the meeting location to see and hear each committee member. (5) If teleconferencing is used, there is a clear audio connection that enables all participants at the meeting location to hear each committee member. (6) A roll call vote is recorded for each vote taken. (7) The meeting minutes specify for each member whether the member attended by videoconference, teleconference, or in person. Sec. 4730.06. (A) The physician assistant policy committee of the state medical board shall review, and shall submit to the board recommendations concerning, all of the following: (1) Requirements for issuing a license to practice as a physician assistant, including the educational requirements that must be met to receive the license; (2) Standards and procedures under which applicants who do not meet all requirements for licensure may become eligible for licensure through additional training or other supportive measures; (3) Existing and proposed rules pertaining to the practice of physician assistants, the supervisory relationship between physician assistants and supervising physicians, and with the board granting the committee an opportunity to review and make recommendations on proposed rules before the board accepts any public comments; (4) Existing and proposed rules on the administration and enforcement of this chapter; (3) In accordance with section 4730.38 of the Revised Code, physician-delegated (5) Policies and procedures regarding the prescriptive authority for of physician assistants, including rules that are adopted under section 4730.39 of the Revised Code; (4)(6) Application procedures and forms for a license to practice as a physician assistant; (5)(7) Fees required by this chapter for issuance and renewal of a license to practice as a physician assistant; (6) (8) Methods for addressing the concerns of physician assistants and the problems they face in their practice, for purposes of ensuring patient safety; (9) Any issue the board asks the committee to consider. (B) In addition to the matters that are required to be reviewed under division (A) of this section, the committee may review, and may submit to the board recommendations concerning, quality assurance systems established and activities to be performed by a supervising physician and physician assistant under a quality assurance system established pursuant to division (F) of for purposes of section 4730.21 4730.081 of the Revised Code. (C) The board shall take into consideration all recommendations submitted by the committee. Not later than ninety days after receiving a recommendation from the committee, the board shall approve or disapprove the recommendation and notify the committee of its decision. If a recommendation is disapproved, the board shall inform the committee of its reasons for making that decision. The committee may resubmit the recommendation after addressing the concerns expressed by the board and modifying the disapproved recommendation accordingly. Not later than ninety days after receiving a resubmitted recommendation, the board shall approve or disapprove the recommendation. There is no limit on the number of times the committee may resubmit a recommendation for consideration by the board. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, the board may not take action regarding a matter that is subject to the committee's review under division (A) or (B) of this section unless the committee has made a recommendation to the board concerning the matter. (2) If the board submits to the committee a request for a recommendation regarding a matter that is subject to the committee's review under division (A) or (B) of this section, and the committee does not provide a recommendation before the sixty-first day after the request is submitted, the board may take action regarding the matter without a recommendation. Sec. 4730.07. In addition to rules that are specifically required or authorized by this chapter to be adopted, the state medical board may, subject to division (D) of section 4730.06 of the Revised Code, adopt any other rules necessary to govern the practice of physician assistants, the supervisory collaborative relationship between physician assistants and supervising their collaborating physicians, and the administration and enforcement of this chapter. Rules adopted under this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.08. (A) A license to practice as a physician assistant issued under this chapter authorizes the holder to practice as a physician assistant as follows: (1) The physician assistant shall practice only under the supervision, control, and direction of in collaboration with a physician with whom the physician assistant has entered into a supervision collaboration agreement under section 4730.19 4730.09 of the Revised Code. (2) The physician assistant shall practice in accordance with the supervision agreement entered into with the physician who is responsible for supervising the If practicing in a health care facility, the physician assistant, including, if applicable, shall practice only as authorized by the policies of the that health care facility in which the physician assistant is practicing and in accordance with the collaboration required by division (A)(1) of this section. (B) The For purposes of division (A)(2) of this section, the state medical board may, subject to division (D) of section 4730.06 of the Revised Code, adopt rules designating facilities to be included as health care facilities that are in addition to the facilities specified in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 4730.01 of the Revised Code. Any rules adopted shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.081. (A) Regardless of the setting in which a physician assistant is practicing, the physician assistant shall participate in a quality assurance system. The system shall be established by the entity that employs or contracts with the physician assistant or, if the physician assistant is practicing as a sole proprietor, by the physician assistant. (B) Each quality assurance system established for purposes of this section shall include a process to be used for all of the following: (1) Routine reviews of selected patient record entries made by the physician assistant and selected medical orders issued by the physician assistant; (2) Discussions of complex cases with peers or experts; (3) Updates regarding medical developments relevant to the practice of physician assistants; (4) Any activities required by rules adopted according to recommendations made under section 4730.06 of the Revised Code; (5) Any other activities considered appropriate by the entity or physician assistant responsible for establishing the system. (C) A physician assistant shall keep records of all activities performed under a quality assurance system. On request of the state medical board, the physician assistant shall make the records available to the board. Sec. 4730.09. This section and section 4730.091 of the Revised Code establish standards and procedures governing the collaboration required under section 4730.08 of the Revised Code for the practice of a physician assistant licensed under this chapter. (A) A physician assistant shall enter into a collaboration agreement with each physician with whom the physician assistant collaborates. The agreement shall specify that the physician agrees to collaborate with the physician assistant and that the physician assistant agrees to practice in collaboration with that physician. The agreement shall be signed by the physician assistant and the physician. (B) A physician assistant may enter into collaboration agreements with any number of collaborating physicians, and a collaborating physician may enter into collaboration agreements with any number of physician assistants. A collaboration agreement may apply to more than one physician assistant, but, except as provided in division (C)(2)(e) of this section, the agreement may not apply to more than one physician. (C) A collaboration agreement shall include the following specifications regarding the practice of physician assistants: (1) If a physician assistant will practice in a health care facility, the agreement shall include terms that acknowledge the requirement of division (A)(2) of section 4730.08 of the Revised Code to practice only as authorized by the policies of that health care facility, subject to any limitations imposed by the collaborating physician under section 4730.091 of the Revised Code. (2) If a physician assistant will practice outside a health care facility, the agreement shall include terms that identify all of the following: (a) The responsibilities to be fulfilled by the physician in collaborating with the physician assistant; (b) The responsibilities to be fulfilled by the physician assistant when performing services in collaboration with the physician; (c) Any limitations on the physician assistant's authority to practice; (d) The circumstances under which the physician assistant is required to refer a patient to the collaborating physician; (e) If the collaborating physician chooses to designate physicians to act as alternate collaborating physicians, the names, business addresses, and business telephone numbers of the physicians who have agreed to act in that capacity. (D) A collaboration agreement may be amended to modify the responsibilities of, or limitations on, any of the physician assistants practicing under the agreement or to include additional physician assistants. (E) Each physician assistant who entered into a collaboration agreement shall retain a copy of the agreement in the records maintained by the physician assistant. The collaborating physician who entered into a collaboration agreement shall retain a copy of the agreement in the records maintained by the collaborating physician. (F)(1) The state medical board may conduct reviews as it considers necessary to determine whether the requirements of this section are being met. (2) If the board finds any of the following, through a review conducted under this section or through any other means, the board may take disciplinary action against the individual under section 4730.25 or 4731.22 of the Revised Code, impose a civil penalty, or both: (a) That a physician assistant has practiced in a manner that departs from, or fails to conform to, the terms of a collaboration agreement that applies to the physician assistant; (b) That a physician has collaborated with a physician assistant in a manner that departs from, or fails to conform to, the terms of a collaboration agreement entered into under this section; (c) That a physician assistant or physician failed to comply with division (A), (B), or (C) of this section. (3) If the board finds, through a review conducted under this section or through any other means, that a physician assistant or physician failed to comply with division (E) of this section, the board may do either of the following: (a) Take disciplinary action against the individual under section 4730.25 or 4731.22 of the Revised Code, impose a civil penalty, or both; (b) Permit the individual to agree in writing to update the records to comply with division (E) of this section and pay a civil penalty. (4) The board's finding in any disciplinary action taken under division (F)(2) or (F)(3)(a) of this section shall be made pursuant to an adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (5) A civil penalty imposed under division (F)(2), imposed under division (F)(3)(a), or paid under division (F)(2)(b) of this section shall be in an amount specified by the board of not more than five thousand dollars. All amounts collected shall be deposited in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.091. (A) Under a collaboration agreement entered into with a physician assistant under section 4730.09 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply to a collaborating physician: (1) The collaborating physician shall be continuously available for direct communication with the physician assistant by either of the following means: (a) Being physically present at the location where the physician assistant is practicing; (b) Being readily available to the physician assistant through some means of telecommunication. (2) The collaborating physician shall personally and actively review the physician assistant's professional activities. (3) The collaborating physician may authorize a physician assistant to perform a service only if the physician is satisfied that the physician assistant is capable of competently performing the service. The collaborating physician shall not authorize a physician assistant to perform any service that is beyond the physician's or the physician assistant's normal course of practice and expertise. (4) In the case of a physician assistant who is practicing in a health care facility, the collaborating physician may impose limitations on the physician assistant's practice that are in addition to any limitations applicable under the policies of the facility. If the health care facility has an emergency department, both of the following apply: (a) If the collaborating physician routinely practices in the facility's emergency department, the physician shall provide on-site collaboration when the physician assistant practices in the emergency department. (b) If the collaborating physician does not routinely practice in the facility's emergency department, the physician may, on occasion, send the physician assistant to the facility's emergency department to assess and manage a patient. At the request of an emergency department physician, the collaborating physician shall personally evaluate the patient. (B) The degree to which collaboration is required to occur between a collaborating physician and a physician assistant shall be based on all of the following: (1) The patient's health condition; (2) The physician assistant's education, experience, and competencies; (3) The standard of care that applies to similar practitioners in similar circumstances; (4) Any determinations made by an employer or other entity that governs the professional practice of the parties subject to a collaboration agreement, including determinations made by a group medical practice or health care facility using credentialing or other systems to establish privileges for the practice of physicians and physician assistants. Sec. 4730.141. (A) An individual who holds a current, valid license issued under this chapter to practice as a physician assistant and who retires voluntarily from practice may request that the state medical board place the individual's license on retired status. (B) An individual seeking to have the individual's license placed on retired status shall file with the board an application in the form and manner prescribed by the board. The application shall be submitted before the end of a biennial renewal period and include all of the following: (1) The applicant's full name, license number, mailing address, and electronic mail address; (2) An attestation that the information included in the application is accurate and truthful and that the applicant meets the following qualifications: (a) That the applicant holds a current, valid license issued under this chapter; (b) That the applicant has retired voluntarily from practice as a physician assistant; (c) That the applicant does not hold an active registration with the federal drug enforcement administration; (d) That the applicant does not have any criminal charges pending against the applicant; (e) That the applicant is not the subject of discipline by, or an investigation pending with, a regulatory agency of this state, another state, or the United States; (f) That the applicant does not have any complaints pending with the board; (g) That the applicant is not, at the time of application, subject to the board's hearing, disciplinary, or compliance processes under the terms of a citation, notice of opportunity for hearing, board order, or consent agreement. (3) A fee in an amount equal to the sum of the biennial renewal fee and restoration penalty described in section 4730.14 of the Revised Code. The board shall not consider an application for retired status complete until the board receives the fee described in this division. On receipt of a fee, the board shall deposit the fee in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. (C) If the board determines that an applicant meets the requirements of division (B) of this section, the board shall place the applicant's license on retired status. The license remains on retired status for the life of the license holder, unless suspended, revoked, or reactivated, and does not require renewal. (D) During the period in which a license is on retired status, all of the following apply: (1) The license holder is prohibited from practicing as a physician assistant under any circumstance. (2) The license holder is not required to complete the continuing education described in sections section 4730.14 and 4730.49 of the Revised Code. (3) The license holder is prohibited from using the license to obtain a license to practice as a physician assistant in another state, whether by endorsement or reciprocity or through a licensure compact. (4) The license holder may use a title authorized for the holder's license, but only if "retired" also is included in the title. (5) In the case of a license holder who was issued a prescriber number by the board as part of the holder's physician-delegated has prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, the prescriber number, like the license, that was issued by the board under that section is placed on retired status along with the license. (E) If a license has been placed on retired status pursuant to this section, it may be reactivated. Subject to section 4730.28 of the Revised Code, the board may reactivate a license placed on retired status if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) The individual seeking to reactivate the license applies to the board in the form and manner prescribed by the board. (2) The applicant certifies completion of, within the two-year period that ends on the date of the application's submission, the continuing education requirements that must be met for renewal of a license. (3) The applicant complies with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. (4) The applicant pays a reactivation fee in an amount equal to the sum of the biennial renewal fee and restoration penalty described in section 4730.14 of the Revised Code. The board shall not consider an application to reactivate a license complete until the board receives the fee described in this division. On receipt of a fee, the board shall deposit the fee in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. (F) The board shall reactivate a license placed on retired status if the conditions of division (E) of this section have been satisfied and the board, in its discretion, determines that the results of the criminal records check conducted pursuant to sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code do not make the applicant ineligible for active status. (G) The board may take disciplinary action against an applicant who is seeking to place a license on retired status or to reactivate the license if the applicant commits fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the retired status or reactivation. The board also may take disciplinary action against the holder of a license placed on retired status if the holder practices under the license, uses the license to obtain licensure as a physician assistant in another state, or uses a title that does not reflect the holder's retired status. In taking disciplinary action under this section, the board may impose on the applicant or holder any sanction described in section 4730.25 of the Revised Code, but shall do so in accordance with the procedures described in that section. (H) The board may adopt rules to implement and enforce this section. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.15. The state medical board shall issue a prescriber number to each physician assistant licensed under this chapter who has prescriptive authority, as provided by one of the following: (A) A license issued by the state medical board under section 4730.12 of the Revised Code authorizes grants prescriptive authority to the license holder to exercise physician-delegated prescriptive authority if the license holder meets either of the following requirements: (1) Holds a master's or higher degree described in division (B) of section 4730.11 of the Revised Code; (2) Had prescriptive authority while practicing as a physician assistant in another jurisdiction, in any of the armed forces of the United States or the national guard of any state, or in the United States public health service commissioned corps. (B) A license described in division (D) of section 4730.11 of the Revised Code authorizes grants prescriptive authority to the license holder to exercise physician-delegated prescriptive authority if, on October 15, 2015, the license holder held a valid certificate to prescribe issued under former section 4730.44 of the Revised Code, as it existed immediately prior to that date. (C) On application of an individual who holds a license issued under this chapter but is not authorized to exercise physician-delegated prescriptive authoritythat did not grant prescriptive authority to the license holder at the time the license was issued, the board shall grant the authority to exercise physician-delegated prescriptive authority to the individual if the individual meets either of the following requirements: (1) The individual provides evidence satisfactory to the board of having obtained a master's or higher degree from either of the following: (a) A program accredited by the accreditation review commission on education for the physician assistant or a predecessor or successor organization recognized by the board; (b) A program accredited by a regional or specialized and professional accrediting agency recognized by the council for higher education accreditation, if the degree is in a course of study with clinical relevance to the practice of physician assistants. (2) The individual meets the requirements specified in division (C)(1) or (3) of section 4730.11 of the Revised Code and had prescriptive authority while practicing as a physician assistant in another jurisdiction, in any of the armed forces of the United States or the national guard of any state, or in the United States public health service commissioned corps. (D) The board shall issue a prescriber number to each physician assistant licensed under this chapter who is authorized to exercise physician-delegated prescriptive authority. Sec. 4730.16. A physician assistant licensed under this chapter may seek reimbursement or any other form of payment for services that are provided by the physician assistant, including by doing any of the following: (A) Enrolling as a provider with a health plan issuer, as defined in section 3922.01 of the Revised Code; (B) Participating in the medicare program; (C) Entering into a medicaid provider agreement under section 5164.301 of the Revised Code; (D) Billing a patient or the patient's representative. Sec. 4730.20. (A) A physician assistant licensed under this chapter may perform any of the following services authorized by the supervising physician that are part of the supervising physician's normal course of practice and expertisemedical service that the physician assistant is competent through education, training, and experience to perform. Subject to division (B) of this section, the medical services that a physician assistant may perform include all of the following: (1) Obtaining and performing comprehensive health histories and physical examinations; (2) Evaluating, diagnosing, managing, and providing medical treatment; (3) Ordering, performing, and interpreting diagnostic studies, therapeutic procedures, and other medical services; (2) Prescribing physical therapy or referring a patient to a physical therapist for physical therapy; (3) Ordering occupational therapy or referring a patient to an occupational therapist for occupational therapy; (4) Educating patients on health promotion and disease prevention; (5) Providing consultation upon request, consulting with other health care providers based on a patient's condition, and referring patients to other health care providers; (6) Planning and initiating a therapeutic regimen that includes ordering, prescribing, and making referrals for non-pharmacological interventions, including durable medical equipment, nutritional programs and products, blood and blood products, and diagnostic support services, including home health care, hospice care, and physical and occupational therapy; (7) Taking any action that may be taken by an attending physician under sections 2133.21 to 2133.26 of the Revised Code, as specified in section 2133.211 of the Revised Code; (5)(8) Determining and pronouncing death in accordance with section 4730.202 of the Revised Code, except for any actions that are limited to physicians for purposes of Chapter 2108. of the Revised Code; (6)(9) Assisting in surgery; (7)(10) If the physician assistant holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board and has been granted physician-delegated has prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, ordering, prescribing, personally furnishing, and administering drugs and therapeutic devices, including medical devices; (8) Any other services that are part of the supervising physician's normal course of practice and expertise(11) Performing routine visual screenings, prescribing optical aids, and dispensing optical aids, with the physician assistant's prescribing and dispensing of optical aids being subject to the same provisions that apply under sections 4725.38 and 4731.44 of the Revised Code; (12) Providing medical care before or following eye surgery and otherwise assisting in the care of diseases of the eye; (13) Obtaining informed consent from patients or their representatives; (14) Supervising, delegating, and assigning therapeutic and diagnostic measures to licensed or unlicensed personnel; (15) Certifying the health or disability of a patient for purposes of any federal, state, or local program or law; (16) Using light-based medical devices for ablative procedures; (17) Performing any other service that is consistent with section 4730.08 of the Revised Code and all other provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and any other provisions of the Revised Code governing the practice of physician assistants. (B) The For purposes of division (A)(2) of section 4730.08 of the Revised Code, the services a physician assistant may provide under the policies of a health care facility are limited to the services the facility authorizes the physician assistant to provide for the facility. A health care facility shall not authorize a physician assistant to perform a service that is prohibited under this chapter. A physician who is supervising a physician assistant within a health care facility may impose limitations on the physician assistant's practice that are in addition to any limitations applicable under the policies of the facility. Sec. 4730.201. (A) As used in this section, "local anesthesia" means the injection of a drug or combination of drugs to stop or prevent a painful sensation in a circumscribed area of the body where a painful procedure is to be performed. "Local anesthesia" includes only local infiltration anesthesia, digital blocks, and pudendal blocks. (B) With respect to medical services involving anesthesia or sedation, and subject to division (B) of this section, all of the following apply to a physician assistant licensed under this chapter: (1) A physician assistant may administer, monitor, or maintain local anesthesia as a component of a procedure the physician assistant is performing or as a separate service when the procedure requiring local anesthesia is to be performed by the physician assistant's supervising physician or another person. A (2) Except as provided in division (A)(3) of this section, a physician assistant shall not administer, monitor, or maintain any other form of anesthesia, including regional anesthesia or any systemic sedation engage in activities involving general anesthesia, monitored anesthesia care, or neuraxial anesthesia. (3) A physician assistant may use general anesthesia induction agents, but only for either of the following purposes: (a) Initiating intubation for patients in urgent or emergent circumstances; (b) Providing sedation for patients on ventilators in intensive care units of health care facilities. (B) The authority granted by division (A) of this section applies only if a physician assistant is competent to perform the services, has obtained any credentials that are required to perform the services, and performs the services in accordance with all applicable statutes, standards of practice, and health care facility protocols. Sec. 4730.203. (A) Acting pursuant to a supervision agreement, a A physician assistant may delegate performance of a task to implement a patient's plan of care or, if the conditions in division (C) of this section are met, may delegate administration of a drug. Subject to division (D) of section 4730.03 of the Revised Code, delegation may be to any person. The physician assistant must be physically present at the location where the task is performed or the drug administered. (B) Prior to delegating a task or administration of a drug, a physician assistant shall determine that the task or drug is appropriate for the patient and the person to whom the delegation is to be made may safely perform the task or administer the drug. (C) A physician assistant may delegate administration of a drug only if all of the following conditions are met: (1) The physician assistant has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority and is authorized to prescribe the drug, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code. (2) The drug is not a controlled substance. (3) The drug will not be administered intravenously. (4) The drug will not be administered in a hospital inpatient care unit, as defined in section 3727.50 of the Revised Code; a hospital emergency department; a freestanding emergency department; or an ambulatory surgical facility licensed under section 3702.30 of the Revised Code. (D) A person not otherwise authorized to administer a drug or perform a specific task may do so in accordance with a physician assistant's delegation under this section. Sec. 4730.204. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, a physician assistant may sign one or more documents relating to any of the following: (1) The admission of a patient to a health care facility for the purpose of receiving psychiatric or other behavioral health care services on an inpatient basis; (2) The discharge of a patient from a health care facility after receiving inpatient psychiatric or other behavioral health care services; (3) The treatment of a patient while at a health care facility on an inpatient basis for psychiatric or other behavioral health care services. The documents may include a treatment plan or any medication order that is part of the treatment plan. (B) To be eligible to sign documents described in this section, all both of the following must be satisfied: (1) The physician assistant is employed by the health care facility in which a patient is receiving psychiatric or other behavioral health care services on an inpatient basis or the physician assistant has been granted appropriate credentials by the facility; (2) The physician assistant's supervising physician is employed by the health care facility in which a patient is receiving psychiatric or other behavioral health care services on an inpatient basis or is a member of the facility's medical staff. (3) The physician assistant's supervising physician has authorized the physician assistant to sign documents described in this section for the physician's patients. (4) The policies of the health care facility authorize the physician assistant to sign documents described in this section. (C) Notwithstanding section 4730.22 of the Revised Code or any other conflicting provision of this chapter, a supervising physician who authorizes a physician assistant to sign one or more documents as described in this section is not liable for damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property for an act or omission that arises from the physician assistant signing the document, and is not subject to administrative action or criminal prosecution for an act or omission that arises from the physician assistant signing the document. Sec. 4730.205. In addition to the authority expressly granted under this chapter or any other provision of the Revised Code, a physician assistant may authenticate any document, including by providing the physician assistant's signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or endorsement, to the same extent and in the same manner that a physician is authorized to authenticate the same type of document. Sec. 4730.22. (A) When performing authorized services, a physician assistant acts as the agent of the physician assistant's supervising physician. The supervising physician is legally responsible and assumes legal liability for the services provided by the physician assistant. The physician is not responsible or liable for any services provided by the physician assistant after their supervision agreement expires or is terminated. (B) When a health care facility permits physician assistants to practice within that facility or any other health care facility under its control, the health care facility shall make reasonable efforts to explain to each individual who may work with a particular physician assistant the scope of that physician assistant's practice within the facility. The appropriate credentialing body within the health care facility shall provide, on request of an individual practicing in the facility with a physician assistant, a copy of the facility's policies on the practice of physician assistants within the facility and a copy of each supervision collaboration agreement applicable to the physician assistant. An individual who follows the orders of a physician assistant practicing in a health care facility is not subject to disciplinary action by any administrative agency that governs that individual's conduct and is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property resulting from the individual's acts or omissions in the performance of any procedure, treatment, or other health care service if the individual reasonably believed that the physician assistant was acting within the proper scope of practice or was relaying medical orders from a supervising physician in a manner that is consistent with section 4730.08 of the Revised Code, unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. Sec. 4730.23. A physician assistant licensed under this chapter is legally responsible and assumes legal liability for the services provided by the physician assistant. Sec. 4730.25. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may refuse to grant a license to practice as a physician assistant to, or may revoke the license held by, an individual found by the board to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) Except as provided in division (N) of this section, the board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice as a physician assistant or prescriber number, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Failure to practice Practicing in accordance with the supervising physician's supervision agreement with the physician assistant, including, if applicable, the policies of the health care facility in which the supervising physician and physician assistant are practicing a manner that is inconsistent with section 4730.08 of the Revised Code; (2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or any rules adopted by the board; (3) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or the rules adopted by the board; (4) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (5) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (6) Administering drugs for purposes other than those authorized under this chapter; (7) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in soliciting or advertising for employment as a physician assistant; in connection with any solicitation or advertisement for patients; in relation to the practice of medicine as it pertains to physician assistants; or in securing or attempting to secure a license to practice as a physician assistant. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) Representing, with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage personally or for any other person, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured; (10) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or anything of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (11) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (12) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (14) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (15) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (17) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for violating any state or federal law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug, including trafficking in drugs; (18) Any of the following actions taken by the state agency responsible for regulating the practice of physician assistants in another state, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (19) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar physician assistants under the same or similar circumstances, regardless of whether actual injury to a patient is established; (20) Violation of the conditions placed by the board on a license to practice as a physician assistant; (21) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (22) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under section 4730.26 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board at a deposition or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (23) Assisting suicide, as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code; (24) Prescribing any drug or device to perform or induce an abortion, or otherwise performing or inducing an abortion; (25) Failure to comply with section 4730.53 of the Revised Code, unless the board no longer maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code; (26) Failure to comply with the requirements in section 3719.061 of the Revised Code before issuing for a minor a prescription for an opioid analgesic, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; (27) Having certification by the national commission on certification of physician assistants or a successor organization expire, lapse, or be suspended or revoked; (28) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of clinical privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs or the termination or suspension of a certificate of registration to prescribe drugs by the drug enforcement administration of the United States department of justice; (29) Failure to comply with terms of a consult agreement entered into with a pharmacist pursuant to section 4729.39 of the Revised Code; (30) Violation of section 4730.57 of the Revised Code; (31) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 3705.16 of the Revised Code when certifying a decedent's cause of death and completing and signing the medical certificate of death. (C) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with a physician assistant or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. (D) For purposes of divisions (B)(12), (15), and (16) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board shall have no jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board shall have jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court issues an order of dismissal upon technical or procedural grounds. (E) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect upon a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or upon the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (F) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license issued under this chapter, or applies for a license issued under this chapter, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(4) of this section, the board, upon a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who holds, or has applied for, a license issued under this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental examination, physical examination, including an HIV test, or both a mental and physical examination. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds a physician assistant unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(4) of this section, the board shall require the physician assistant to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license. An individual affected under this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(5) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license issued under this chapter or any applicant for a license suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the physician assistant shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice or prescribing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired physician assistant resumes practice or prescribing, the board shall require continued monitoring of the physician assistant. The monitoring shall include compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, upon termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the physician assistant has maintained sobriety. (G)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend the individual's license without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine that there is clear and convincing evidence that a physician assistant has violated division (B) of this section and that the individual's continued practice or prescribing presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court with a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, upon review of those allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If the physician assistant requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the physician assistant requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the license holder. (3) A summary suspension imposed under division (G)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (H) If the board takes action under division (B)(11), (13), or (14) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. Upon receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the individual's license. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions identified under division (B) of this section. (I) The license to practice issued to a physician assistant and the physician assistant's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the physician assistant pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another state for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall notify the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license to practice. (J) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In that final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (K) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the physician assistant's license may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (L) When the board refuses to grant or issue to an applicant a license to practice as a physician assistant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold the license and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (M) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license issued under this chapter is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license in accordance with section 4730.14 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4730.141 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. (N) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a conviction, plea of guilty, judicial finding of guilt, judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, or the commission of an act that constitutes a criminal offense, unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.26. (A) The state medical board shall investigate evidence that appears to show that any person has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under it. In an investigation involving the practice or supervision of a physician assistant pursuant to the policies of a health care facility, the board may require that the health care facility provide any information the board considers necessary to identify either or both of the following: (1) The facility's policies for the practice of physician assistants within the facility; (2) The services that the facility has authorized a particular physician assistant to provide for the facility. (B) Any person may report to the board in a signed writing any information the person has that appears to show a violation of any provision of this chapter or rule adopted under it. In the absence of bad faith, a person who reports such information or testifies before the board in an adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of reporting the information or providing testimony. Each complaint or allegation of a violation received by the board shall be assigned a case number and be recorded by the board. (C) Investigations of alleged violations of this chapter or rules adopted under it shall be supervised by the supervising member elected by the board in accordance with section 4731.02 of the Revised Code and by the secretary as provided in section 4730.33 of the Revised Code. The president may designate another member of the board to supervise the investigation in place of the supervising member. Upon a vote of the majority of the board to authorize the addition of a consumer member in the supervision of any part of any investigation, the president shall designate a consumer member for supervision of investigations as determined by the president. The authorization of consumer member participation in investigation supervision may be rescinded by a majority vote of the board. A member of the board who supervises the investigation of a case shall not participate in further adjudication of the case. (D) In investigating a possible violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under it, the board may administer oaths, order the taking of depositions, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents, and testimony, except that a subpoena for patient record information shall not be issued without consultation with the attorney general's office and approval of the secretary of the board. Before issuance of a subpoena for patient record information, the secretary shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the complaint filed alleges a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under it and that the records sought are relevant to the alleged violation and material to the investigation. The subpoena may apply only to records that cover a reasonable period of time surrounding the alleged violation. On failure to comply with any subpoena issued by the board and after reasonable notice to the person being subpoenaed, the board may move for an order compelling the production of persons or records pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure. A subpoena issued by the board may be served by a sheriff, the sheriff's deputy, or a board employee designated by the board. Service of a subpoena issued by the board may be made by delivering a copy of the subpoena to the person named therein, reading it to the person, or leaving it at the person's usual place of residence. When the person being served is a physician assistant, service of the subpoena may be made by certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested, and the subpoena shall be deemed served on the date delivery is made or the date the person refuses to accept delivery. A sheriff's deputy who serves a subpoena shall receive the same fees as a sheriff. Each witness who appears before the board in obedience to a subpoena shall receive the fees and mileage provided for under section 119.094 of the Revised Code. (E) All hearings and investigations of the board shall be considered civil actions for the purposes of section 2305.252 of the Revised Code. (F) Information received by the board pursuant to an investigation is confidential and not subject to discovery in any civil action. The board shall conduct all investigations and proceedings in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and persons who file complaints with the board. The board shall not make public the names or any other identifying information about patients or complainants unless proper consent is given or, in the case of a patient, a waiver of the patient privilege exists under division (B) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code, except that consent or a waiver is not required if the board possesses reliable and substantial evidence that no bona fide physician-patient relationship exists. The board may share any information it receives pursuant to an investigation, including patient records and patient record information, with law enforcement agencies, other licensing boards, and other governmental agencies that are prosecuting, adjudicating, or investigating alleged violations of statutes or administrative rules. An agency or board that receives the information shall comply with the same requirements regarding confidentiality as those with which the state medical board must comply, notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code or procedure of the agency or board that applies when it is dealing with other information in its possession. In a judicial proceeding, the information may be admitted into evidence only in accordance with the Rules of Evidence, but the court shall require that appropriate measures are taken to ensure that confidentiality is maintained with respect to any part of the information that contains names or other identifying information about patients or complainants whose confidentiality was protected by the state medical board when the information was in the board's possession. Measures to ensure confidentiality that may be taken by the court include sealing its records or deleting specific information from its records. No person shall knowingly access, use, or disclose confidential investigatory information in a manner prohibited by law. (G) The state medical board shall develop requirements for and provide appropriate initial and continuing training for investigators employed by the board to carry out its duties under this chapter. The training and continuing education may include enrollment in courses operated or approved by the Ohio peace officer training commission that the board considers appropriate under conditions set forth in section 109.79 of the Revised Code. (H) On a quarterly basis, the board shall prepare a report that documents the disposition of all cases during the preceding three months. The report shall contain the following information for each case with which the board has completed its activities: (1) The case number assigned to the complaint or alleged violation; (2) The type of license, if any, held by the individual against whom the complaint is directed; (3) A description of the allegations contained in the complaint; (4) Whether witnesses were interviewed; (5) Whether the individual against whom the complaint is directed is the subject of any pending complaints; (6) The disposition of the case. The report shall state how many cases are still pending, and shall be prepared in a manner that protects the identity of each person involved in each case. The report shall be submitted to the physician assistant policy committee of the board and is a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (I) The board may provide a status update regarding an investigation to a complainant on request if the board verifies the complainant's identity. Sec. 4730.39. (A) The state medical board, subject to division (D) of section 4730.06 of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules governing physician-delegated the prescriptive authority for of physician assistants. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B) The board's rules governing physician-delegated the prescriptive authority of physician assistants shall establish all of the following: (1) Requirements regarding the pharmacology courses that a physician assistant is required to complete; (2) A specific prohibition against prescribing any drug or device to perform or induce an abortion; (3)(2) Standards and procedures to be followed by a physician assistant in personally furnishing samples of drugs or complete or partial supplies of drugs to patients under section 4730.43 of the Revised Code; (4)(3) Any other requirements the board considers necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter regarding physician-delegated the prescriptive authority of physician assistants. Sec. 4730.41. (A) A physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board is authorized to prescribe and personally furnish drugs and therapeutic devices in the exercise of physician-delegated prescriptive authority. (B) In exercising physician-delegated has prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, a physician assistant is subject to all of the following in the exercise of that authority: (1) The physician assistant shall exercise physician-delegated prescriptive authority only to the extent that the physician supervising the physician assistant has granted that authority. (2) The physician assistant shall comply with all conditions placed on the physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as specified by the supervising physician who is supervising the physician assistant in the exercise of physician-delegated prescriptive authority. (3) If the physician assistant possesses physician-delegated prescriptive authority for controlled substances, the (A) The physician assistant shall register with the federal drug enforcement administration as a condition of being authorized to prescribe controlled substances. (4) If the physician assistant possesses physician-delegated prescriptive authority for (B) When prescribing schedule II controlled substances, the physician assistant shall comply with section 4730.411 of the Revised Code. (5) If the physician assistant possesses physician-delegated prescriptive authority to prescribe for a minor (C) When prescribing an opioid analgesic for a minor, as those terms are defined in sections 3719.01 and 3719.061 and 3719.01 of the Revised Code, respectively, the physician assistant shall comply with section 3719.061 of the Revised Code. (6) The physician assistant shall comply with the requirements of section 4730.44 of the Revised Code. (C)(D) A physician assistant shall not prescribe any drug in violation of state or federal law. Sec. 4730.411. (A) Except as provided in division (B) or (C) of this section, a physician assistant who has prescriptive authority as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code may prescribe to a patient a schedule II controlled substance only if all of the following are the case: (1) The patient is in a terminal condition, as defined in section 2133.01 of the Revised Code. (2) The physician assistant's supervising collaborating physician initially prescribed the substance for the patient. (3) The prescription is for an amount that does not exceed the amount necessary for the patient's use in a single, twenty-four-hour period. (B) The restrictions on prescriptive authority in division (A) of this section do not apply if a physician assistant issues the prescription to the patient from any of the following locations: (1) A hospital as defined in section 3722.01 licensed under Chapter 3722. of the Revised Code; (2) An entity owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by a hospital or by an entity that owns or controls, in whole or in part, one or more hospitals; (3) A health care facility operated by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the department of developmental disabilities; (4) A nursing home licensed under section 3721.02 of the Revised Code or by a political subdivision certified under section 3721.09 of the Revised Code; (5) A county home or district home operated under Chapter 5155. of the Revised Code that is certified under the medicare or medicaid program; (6) A hospice care program, as defined in section 3712.01 licensed under Chapter 3712. of the Revised Code; (7) A community mental health services provider, as defined in section 5122.01 5119.01 of the Revised Code; (8) An ambulatory surgical facility, as defined in licensed under section 3702.30 of the Revised Code; (9) A freestanding birthing center, as defined in section 3701.503 of the Revised Code; (10) A federally qualified health center, as defined in section 3701.047 of the Revised Code; (11) A federally qualified health center look-alike, as defined in section 3701.047 of the Revised Code; (12) A health care office or facility operated by the board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health under section 3709.05 of the Revised Code; (13) A site where a medical practice is operated, but only if the practice is comprised of one or more physicians who also are owners of the practice; the practice is organized to provide direct patient care; and the physician assistant has entered into a supervisory collaboration agreement with at least one of the physician owners who practices primarily at that site; (14) A site where a behavioral health practice is operated that does not qualify as a location otherwise described in division (B) of this section, but only if the practice is organized to provide outpatient services for the treatment of mental health conditions, substance use disorders, or both, and the physician assistant providing services at the site of the practice has entered into a supervisory collaboration agreement with at least one physician who is employed by that practice. (C) A physician assistant shall not issue to a patient a prescription for a schedule II controlled substance from a convenience care clinic even if the convenience care clinic is owned or operated by an entity specified in division (B) of this section. (D) A pharmacist who acts in good faith reliance on a prescription issued by a physician assistant under division (B) of this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for relying on the prescription: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action by the state board of pharmacy under Chapter 4729. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.43. (A) A physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, may personally furnish to a patient samples of drugs and therapeutic devices that are included in the physician assistant's physician-delegated prescriptive authority, subject to all of the following: (1) The amount of the sample furnished shall not exceed a seventy-two-hour supply, except when the minimum available quantity of the sample is packaged in an amount that is greater than a seventy-two-hour supply, in which case the physician assistant may furnish the sample in the package packaged amount. (2) No charge may be imposed for the sample or for furnishing it. (3) Samples of controlled substances may not be personally furnished. (B) A physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, may personally furnish to a patient a complete or partial supply of the drugs and therapeutic devices that are included in the physician assistant's physician-delegated prescriptive authority, subject to all of the following: (1) The physician assistant shall personally furnish only antibiotics, antifungals, scabicides, contraceptives, prenatal vitamins, antihypertensives, drugs and devices used in the treatment of diabetes, drugs and devices used in the treatment of asthma, and drugs used in the treatment of dyslipidemia. (2) The physician assistant shall not furnish the drugs and devices in locations other than the following: (a) A health department operated by the board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health under section 3709.05 of the Revised Code; (b) A federally funded comprehensive primary care clinic; (c) A nonprofit health care clinic or program; (d) An employer-based clinic that provides health care services to the employer's employees. (3) The physician assistant shall comply with all standards and procedures for personally furnishing supplies of drugs and devices, as established in rules adopted under section 4730.39 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.432. (A)(1) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, may issue a prescription for, or personally furnish a complete or partial supply of, a drug to treat chlamydia, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis without having examined the individual for whom the drug is intended, if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The individual is a sexual partner of the physician assistant's patient. (b) The patient has been diagnosed with chlamydia, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis. (c) The patient reports to the physician assistant that the individual is unable or unlikely to be evaluated or treated by a health professional. (2) A prescription issued under this section shall include the individual's name and address, if known. If the physician assistant is unable to obtain the individual's name and address, the prescription shall include the patient's name and address and the words "expedited partner therapy" or the letters "EPT." (3) A physician assistant may prescribe or personally furnish a drug under this section for not more than a total of two individuals who are sexual partners of the physician assistant's patient. (B) For each drug prescribed or personally furnished under this section, the physician assistant shall do all of the following: (1) Provide the patient with information concerning the drug for the purpose of sharing the information with the individual, including directions for use of the drug and any side effects, adverse reactions, or known contraindications associated with the drug; (2) Recommend to the patient that the individual seek treatment from a health professional; (3) Document all of the following in the patient's record: (a) The name of the drug prescribed or furnished and its dosage; (b) That information concerning the drug was provided to the patient for the purpose of sharing the information with the individual; (c) If known, any adverse reactions the individual experiences from treatment with the drug. (C) A physician assistant who prescribes or personally furnishes a drug under this section may contact the individual for whom the drug is intended. (1) If the physician assistant contacts the individual, the physician assistant shall do all of the following: (a) Inform the individual that the individual may have been exposed to chlamydia, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis; (b) Encourage the individual to seek treatment from a health professional; (c) Explain the treatment options available to the individual, including treatment with a prescription drug, directions for use of the drug, and any side effects, adverse reactions, or known contraindications associated with the drug; (d) Document in the patient's record that the physician assistant contacted the individual. (2) If the physician assistant does not contact the individual, the physician assistant shall document that fact in the patient's record. (D) A physician assistant who in good faith prescribes or personally furnishes a drug under this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following: (1) Damages in any civil action; (2) Prosecution in any criminal proceeding; (3) Professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4730.433. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician assistant who holds a license issued under this chapter and a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom epinephrine may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5180.26 of the Revised Code. (2) An epinephrine autoinjector personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A physician assistant who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which an epinephrine autoinjector is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4730.437. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom glucagon may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5180.262 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for injectable or nasally administered glucagon in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5180.262 of the Revised Code. (2) Injectable or nasally administered glucagon personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A physician assistant who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which injectable or nasally administered glucagon is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4730.49. (A) To be eligible for renewal of a license to practice as a physician assistant, an applicant who has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority is subject to both of the following: (1) The applicant shall complete every two years at least twelve hours of continuing education in pharmacology obtained through a program or course approved by the state medical board or a person the board has authorized to approve continuing pharmacology education programs and courses. Except as provided in section 5903.12 of the Revised Code, the continuing education shall be completed not later than the date on which the applicant's license expires. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(2)(b) (B) of this section, in the case of an applicant for renewal of a license issued under this chapter who prescribes opioid analgesics or benzodiazepines, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code, the applicant shall certify to the state medical board whether the applicant has been granted access to the drug database established and maintained by the state board of pharmacy pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code. (b)(B) The requirement described in division (A)(2)(a)(A) of this section does not apply if any of the following is the case: (i)(1) The state board of pharmacy notifies the state medical board pursuant to section 4729.861 of the Revised Code that the applicant has been restricted from obtaining further information from the drug database. (ii)(2) The state board of pharmacy no longer maintains the drug database. (iii)(3) The applicant does not practice as a physician assistant in this state. (c)(C) If an applicant certifies to the state medical board that the applicant has been granted access to the drug database and the board finds through an audit or other means that the applicant has not been granted access, the board may take action under section 4730.25 of the Revised Code. (B) The state medical board shall provide for pro rata reductions by month of the number of hours of continuing education in pharmacology that is required to be completed for physician assistants who have been disabled due to illness or accident or have been absent from the country. The board shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, as necessary to implement this division. (C) The continuing education required by this section is in addition to the continuing education required under section 4730.14 of the Revised Code. (D) If the board chooses to authorize persons to approve continuing pharmacology education programs and courses, it shall establish standards for granting that authority and grant the authority in accordance with the standards. Sec. 4730.53. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Drug database" means the database established and maintained by the state board of pharmacy pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code. (2) "Opioid analgesic" and "benzodiazepine" have the same meanings as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (E) of this section, a physician assistant licensed under this chapter who has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revise Code, shall comply with all of the following as conditions of prescribing a drug that is either an opioid analgesic or a benzodiazepine as part of a patient's course of treatment for a particular condition: (1) Before initially prescribing the drug, the physician assistant or the physician assistant's delegate shall request from the drug database a report of information related to the patient that covers at least the twelve months immediately preceding the date of the request. If the physician assistant practices primarily in a county of this state that adjoins another state, the physician assistant or delegate also shall request a report of any information available in the drug database that pertains to prescriptions issued or drugs furnished to the patient in the state adjoining that county. (2) If the patient's course of treatment for the condition continues for more than ninety days after the initial report is requested, the physician assistant or delegate shall make periodic requests for reports of information from the drug database until the course of treatment has ended. The requests shall be made at intervals not exceeding ninety days, determined according to the date the initial request was made. The request shall be made in the same manner provided in division (B)(1) of this section for requesting the initial report of information from the drug database. (3) On receipt of a report under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, the physician assistant shall assess the information in the report. The physician assistant shall document in the patient's record that the report was received and the information was assessed. (C) Division (B) of this section does not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) A drug database report regarding the patient is not available, in which case the physician assistant shall document in the patient's record the reason that the report is not available. (2) The drug is prescribed in an amount indicated for a period not to exceed seven days. (3) The drug is prescribed for the treatment of cancer or another condition associated with cancer. (4) The drug is prescribed to a hospice patient in a hospice care program, as those terms are defined in section 3712.01 of the Revised Code, or any other patient diagnosed as terminally ill. (5) The drug is prescribed for administration in a hospital, nursing home, or residential care facility. (D) The state medical board may adopt rules that establish standards and procedures to be followed by a physician assistant licensed under this chapter who has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, as provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, regarding the review of patient information available through the drug database under division (A)(5) of section 4729.80 of the Revised Code. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (E) This section and any rules adopted under it do not apply if the state board of pharmacy no longer maintains the drug database. Sec. 4730.56. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Community addiction services provider" has the same meaning as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Medication-assisted , "medication-assisted treatment" has the same meaning as in section 340.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A physician assistant shall comply with section 3719.064 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under section 4730.55 of the Revised Code when treating a patient with medication-assisted treatment or proposing to initiate such treatment. Sec. 4731.22. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, may limit, revoke, or suspend a license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend, refuse to grant a license or certificate, refuse to renew a license or certificate, refuse to reinstate a license or certificate, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license or certificate if the individual applying for or holding the license or certificate is found by the board to have committed fraud during the administration of the examination for a license or certificate to practice or to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for, renewing, or securing any license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend issued by the board. (B) Except as provided in division (P) of this section, the board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend a license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend, refuse to issue a license or certificate, refuse to renew a license or certificate, refuse to reinstate a license or certificate, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license or certificate for one or more of the following reasons: (1) Permitting one's name or one's license or certificate to practice to be used by a person, group, or corporation when the individual concerned is not actually directing the treatment given; (2) Failure to maintain minimal standards applicable to the selection or administration of drugs, or failure to employ acceptable scientific methods in the selection of drugs or other modalities for treatment of disease; (3) Except as provided in section 4731.97 of the Revised Code, selling, giving away, personally furnishing, prescribing, or administering drugs for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes or a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction of, a violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug; (4) Willfully betraying a professional confidence. For purposes of this division, "willfully betraying a professional confidence" does not include providing any information, documents, or reports under sections 307.621 to 307.629 of the Revised Code to a child fatality review board; does not include providing any information, documents, or reports under sections 307.631 to 307.6410 of the Revised Code to a drug overdose fatality review committee, a suicide fatality review committee, or hybrid drug overdose fatality and suicide fatality review committee; does not include providing any information, documents, or reports under sections 307.651 to 307.659 of the Revised Code to a domestic violence fatality review board; does not include providing any information, documents, or reports to the director of health pursuant to guidelines established under section 3701.70 of the Revised Code; does not include written notice to a mental health professional under section 4731.62 of the Revised Code; does not include making a report as described in division (F) of section 2921.22 and section 4731.224 of the Revised Code; and does not include the making of a report of an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or a report of a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee as described in division (B) of section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division affects the immunity from civil liability conferred by section 2305.33 or 4731.62 of the Revised Code upon a physician who makes a report in accordance with section 2305.33 or notifies a mental health professional in accordance with section 4731.62 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. (5) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in the solicitation of or advertising for patients; in relation to the practice of medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, podiatric medicine and surgery, or a limited branch of medicine; or in securing or attempting to secure any license or certificate to practice issued by the board. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (6) A departure from, or the failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances, whether or not actual injury to a patient is established; (7) Representing, with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage as personal gain or for any other person, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured; (8) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or anything of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (9) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (10) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (11) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (12) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (14) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (15) Violation of the conditions of limitation placed by the board upon a license or certificate to practice; (16) Failure to pay license renewal fees specified in this chapter; (17) Except as authorized in section 4731.31 of the Revised Code, engaging in the division of fees for referral of patients, or the receiving of a thing of value in return for a specific referral of a patient to utilize a particular service or business; (18) Subject to section 4731.226 of the Revised Code, violation of any provision of a code of ethics of the American medical association, the American osteopathic association, the American podiatric medical association, or any other national professional organizations that the board specifies by rule. The state medical board shall obtain and keep on file current copies of the codes of ethics of the various national professional organizations. The individual whose license or certificate is being suspended or revoked shall not be found to have violated any provision of a code of ethics of an organization not appropriate to the individual's profession. For purposes of this division, a "provision of a code of ethics of a national professional organization" does not include any provision that would preclude the making of a report by a physician of an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or of a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee as described in division (B) of section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division affects the immunity from civil liability conferred by that section upon a physician who makes either type of report in accordance with division (B) of that section. As used in this division, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. (19) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including, but not limited to, physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills. In enforcing this division, the board, upon a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who is authorized to practice by this chapter or who has submitted an application pursuant to this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental examination, physical examination, including an HIV test, or both a mental and a physical examination. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds an individual unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in this division, the board shall require the individual to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed authority to practice. An individual affected under this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the provisions of the individual's license or certificate. For the purpose of this division, any individual who applies for or receives a license or certificate to practice under this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state and, by so doing, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (20) Except as provided in division (F)(1)(b) of section 4731.282 of the Revised Code or when civil penalties are imposed under section 4731.225 of the Revised Code, and subject to section 4731.226 of the Revised Code, violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provisions of this chapter or any rule promulgated by the board. This division does not apply to a violation or attempted violation of, assisting in or abetting the violation of, or a conspiracy to violate, any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the board that would preclude the making of a report by a physician of an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or of a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee as described in division (B) of section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division affects the immunity from civil liability conferred by that section upon a physician who makes either type of report in accordance with division (B) of that section. As used in this division, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. (21) The violation of section 3701.79 of the Revised Code or of any abortion rule adopted by the director of health pursuant to section 3701.341 of the Revised Code; (22) Any of the following actions taken by an agency responsible for authorizing, certifying, or regulating an individual to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services in this state or another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (23) The violation of section 2919.12 of the Revised Code or the performance or inducement of an abortion upon a pregnant woman with actual knowledge that the conditions specified in division (B) of section 2317.56 of the Revised Code have not been satisfied or with a heedless indifference as to whether those conditions have been satisfied, unless an affirmative defense as specified in division (H)(2) of that section would apply in a civil action authorized by division (H)(1) of that section; (24) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of clinical privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs or the termination or suspension of a certificate of registration to prescribe drugs by the drug enforcement administration of the United States department of justice; (25) Termination or suspension from participation in the medicare or medicaid programs by the department of health and human services or other responsible agency; (26) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice. For the purposes of this division, any individual authorized to practice by this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state subject to supervision by the board. By filing an application for or holding a license or certificate to practice under this chapter, an individual shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when ordered to do so by the board in writing, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute privileged communications. If it has reason to believe that any individual authorized to practice by this chapter or any applicant for licensure or certification to practice suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician who is qualified to conduct the examination and who is approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or certificate or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure or certification to practice, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license or certificate suspended under this division, the impaired practitioner shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care under the provisions of the practitioner's license or certificate. The demonstration shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making the assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license or certificate suspended under this division after that demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired practitioner resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the individual. The monitoring shall include, but not be limited to, compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, upon termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of perjury stating whether the individual has maintained sobriety. (27) A second or subsequent violation of section 4731.66 or 4731.69 of the Revised Code; (28) Except as provided in division (N) of this section: (a) Waiving the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers the individual's services, otherwise would be required to pay if the waiver is used as an enticement to a patient or group of patients to receive health care services from that individual; (b) Advertising that the individual will waive the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers the individual's services, otherwise would be required to pay. (29) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (30) Failure to provide notice to, and receive acknowledgment of the notice from, a patient when required by section 4731.143 of the Revised Code prior to providing nonemergency professional services, or failure to maintain that notice in the patient's medical record; (31) Failure of a physician supervising who has entered into a collaboration agreement with a physician assistant under section 4730.09 of the Revised Code to maintain supervision in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that chapter fulfill the responsibilities of collaboration after entering into the agreement; (32) Failure of a physician or podiatrist to enter into a standard care arrangement with a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner with whom the physician or podiatrist is in collaboration pursuant to section 4731.27 of the Revised Code or failure to fulfill the responsibilities of collaboration after entering into a standard care arrangement; (33) Failure to comply with the terms of a consult agreement entered into with a pharmacist pursuant to section 4729.39 of the Revised Code; (34) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under division (F) of this section, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board in an investigative interview, an investigative office conference, at a deposition, or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (35) Failure to supervise an anesthesiologist assistant in accordance with Chapter 4760. of the Revised Code and the board's rules for supervision of an anesthesiologist assistant; (36) Assisting suicide, as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code; (37) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 2317.561 of the Revised Code; (38) Failure to supervise a radiologist assistant in accordance with Chapter 4774. of the Revised Code and the board's rules for supervision of radiologist assistants; (39) Performing or inducing an abortion at an office or facility with knowledge that the office or facility fails to post the notice required under section 3701.791 of the Revised Code; (40) Failure to comply with the standards and procedures established in rules under section 4731.054 of the Revised Code for the operation of or the provision of care at a pain management clinic; (41) Failure to comply with the standards and procedures established in rules under section 4731.054 of the Revised Code for providing supervision, direction, and control of individuals at a pain management clinic; (42) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 4729.79 or 4731.055 of the Revised Code, unless the state board of pharmacy no longer maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code; (43) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 2919.171, 2919.202, or 2919.203 of the Revised Code or failure to submit to the department of health in accordance with a court order a complete report as described in section 2919.171 or 2919.202 of the Revised Code; (44) Practicing at a facility that is subject to licensure as a category III terminal distributor of dangerous drugs with a pain management clinic classification unless the person operating the facility has obtained and maintains the license with the classification; (45) Owning a facility that is subject to licensure as a category III terminal distributor of dangerous drugs with a pain management clinic classification unless the facility is licensed with the classification; (46) Failure to comply with any of the requirements regarding making or maintaining medical records or documents described in division (A) of section 2919.192, division (C) of section 2919.193, division (B) of section 2919.195, or division (A) of section 2919.196 of the Revised Code; (47) Failure to comply with the requirements in section 3719.061 of the Revised Code before issuing for a minor a prescription for an opioid analgesic, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; (48) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 4731.30 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under section 4731.301 of the Revised Code when recommending treatment with medical marijuana; (49) A pattern of continuous or repeated violations of division (E)(2) or (3) of section 3963.02 of the Revised Code; (50) Failure to fulfill the responsibilities of a collaboration agreement entered into with an athletic trainer as described in section 4755.621 of the Revised Code; (51) Failure to take the steps specified in section 4731.911 of the Revised Code following an abortion or attempted abortion in an ambulatory surgical facility or other location that is not a hospital when a child is born alive; (52) Violation of section 4731.77 of the Revised Code; (53) Failure of a physician supervising a certified mental health assistant to maintain supervision in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that chapter; (54) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 3705.16 of the Revised Code when certifying a decedent's cause of death and completing and signing the medical certificate of death. (C) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an individual to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. A telephone conference call may be utilized for ratification of a consent agreement that revokes or suspends an individual's license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. If the board takes disciplinary action against an individual under division (B) of this section for a second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of section 2919.123 or 2919.124 of the Revised Code, the disciplinary action shall consist of a suspension of the individual's license or certificate to practice for a period of at least one year or, if determined appropriate by the board, a more serious sanction involving the individual's license or certificate to practice. Any consent agreement entered into under this division with an individual that pertains to a second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of that section shall provide for a suspension of the individual's license or certificate to practice for a period of at least one year or, if determined appropriate by the board, a more serious sanction involving the individual's license or certificate to practice. (D) For purposes of divisions (B)(10), (12), and (14) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the individual committed the act. The board does not have jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court renders a final judgment in the individual's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board has jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court issues an order of dismissal upon technical or procedural grounds. (E) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect upon a prior board order entered under this section or upon the board's jurisdiction to take action under this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, expunge, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing of conviction records. (F)(1) The board shall investigate evidence that appears to show that a person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. Any person may report to the board in a signed writing any information that the person may have that appears to show a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. In the absence of bad faith, any person who reports information of that nature or who testifies before the board in any adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall not be liable in damages in a civil action as a result of the report or testimony. Each complaint or allegation of a violation received by the board shall be assigned a case number and shall be recorded by the board. (2) Investigations of alleged violations of this chapter or any rule adopted under it shall be supervised by the supervising member elected by the board in accordance with section 4731.02 of the Revised Code and by the secretary as provided in section 4731.39 of the Revised Code. The president may designate another member of the board to supervise the investigation in place of the supervising member. Upon a vote of the majority of the board to authorize the addition of a consumer member in the supervision of any part of any investigation, the president shall designate a consumer member for supervision of investigations as determined by the president. The authorization of consumer member participation in investigation supervision may be rescinded by a majority vote of the board. No member of the board who supervises the investigation of a case shall participate in further adjudication of the case. (3) In investigating a possible violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, or in conducting an inspection under division (E) of section 4731.054 of the Revised Code, the board may question witnesses, conduct interviews, administer oaths, order the taking of depositions, inspect and copy any books, accounts, papers, records, or documents, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents, and testimony, except that a subpoena for patient record information shall not be issued without consultation with the attorney general's office and approval of the secretary of the board. (a) Before issuance of a subpoena for patient record information, the secretary shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the complaint filed alleges a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it and that the records sought are relevant to the alleged violation and material to the investigation. The subpoena may apply only to records that cover a reasonable period of time surrounding the alleged violation. (b) On failure to comply with any subpoena issued by the board and after reasonable notice to the person being subpoenaed, the board may move for an order compelling the production of persons or records pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure. (c) A subpoena issued by the board may be served by a sheriff, the sheriff's deputy, or a board employee or agent designated by the board. Service of a subpoena issued by the board may be made by delivering a copy of the subpoena to the person named therein, reading it to the person, or leaving it at the person's usual place of residence, usual place of business, or address on file with the board. When serving a subpoena to an applicant for or the holder of a license or certificate issued under this chapter, service of the subpoena may be made by certified mail, return receipt requested, and the subpoena shall be deemed served on the date delivery is made or the date the person refuses to accept delivery. If the person being served refuses to accept the subpoena or is not located, service may be made to an attorney who notifies the board that the attorney is representing the person. (d) A sheriff's deputy who serves a subpoena shall receive the same fees as a sheriff. Each witness who appears before the board in obedience to a subpoena shall receive the fees and mileage provided for under section 119.094 of the Revised Code. (4) All hearings, investigations, and inspections of the board shall be considered civil actions for the purposes of section 2305.252 of the Revised Code. (5) A report required to be submitted to the board under this chapter, a complaint, or information received by the board pursuant to an investigation or pursuant to an inspection under division (E) of section 4731.054 of the Revised Code is confidential and not subject to discovery in any civil action. The board shall conduct all investigations or inspections and proceedings in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and persons who file complaints with the board. The board shall not make public the names or any other identifying information about patients or complainants unless proper consent is given or, in the case of a patient, a waiver of the patient privilege exists under division (B) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code, except that consent or a waiver of that nature is not required if the board possesses reliable and substantial evidence that no bona fide physician-patient relationship exists. The board may share any information it receives pursuant to an investigation or inspection, including patient records and patient record information, with law enforcement agencies, other licensing boards, and other governmental agencies that are prosecuting, adjudicating, or investigating alleged violations of statutes or administrative rules. An agency or board that receives the information shall comply with the same requirements regarding confidentiality as those with which the state medical board must comply, notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code or procedure of the agency or board that applies when it is dealing with other information in its possession. In a judicial proceeding, the information may be admitted into evidence only in accordance with the Rules of Evidence, but the court shall require that appropriate measures are taken to ensure that confidentiality is maintained with respect to any part of the information that contains names or other identifying information about patients or complainants whose confidentiality was protected by the state medical board when the information was in the board's possession. Measures to ensure confidentiality that may be taken by the court include sealing its records or deleting specific information from its records. No person shall knowingly access, use, or disclose confidential investigatory information in a manner prohibited by law. (6) On a quarterly basis, the board shall prepare a report that documents the disposition of all cases during the preceding three months. The report shall contain the following information for each case with which the board has completed its activities: (a) The case number assigned to the complaint or alleged violation; (b) The type of license or certificate to practice, if any, held by the individual against whom the complaint is directed; (c) A description of the allegations contained in the complaint; (d) Whether witnesses were interviewed; (e) Whether the individual against whom the complaint is directed is the subject of any pending complaints; (f) The disposition of the case. The report shall state how many cases are still pending and shall be prepared in a manner that protects the identity of each person involved in each case. The report shall be a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (7) The board may provide a status update regarding an investigation to a complainant on request if the board verifies the complainant's identity. (G)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend an individual's license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that an individual has violated division (B) of this section; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court with a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, upon review of those allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license or certificate without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If the individual subject to the summary suspension requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the individual requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the individual. (3) Any summary suspension imposed under division (G)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. A failure to issue the order within seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (H) If the board takes action under division (B)(9), (11), or (13) of this section and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. Upon receipt of a petition of that nature and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the individual's license or certificate to practice. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of an opportunity for a hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act or if no hearing is requested, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (B) of this section. (I) The license or certificate to practice issued to an individual under this chapter and the individual's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date of the individual's second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of section 2919.123 or 2919.124 of the Revised Code. In addition, the license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend issued to an individual under this chapter and the individual's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the individual pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after suspension shall be considered practicing without a license or certificate. The board shall notify the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license or certificate is automatically suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall do whichever of the following is applicable: (1) If the automatic suspension under this division is for a second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of section 2919.123 or 2919.124 of the Revised Code, the board shall enter an order suspending the individual's license or certificate to practice for a period of at least one year or, if determined appropriate by the board, imposing a more serious sanction involving the individual's license or certificate to practice. (2) In all circumstances in which division (I)(1) of this section does not apply, enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license or certificate to practice. (J) If the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of an opportunity for a hearing and if the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In that final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (K) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension from practice shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the individual's license or certificate to practice may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license or certificate suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (L) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license or certificate to practice to an applicant, revokes an individual's license or certificate to practice, refuses to renew an individual's license or certificate to practice, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license or certificate to practice, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license or certificate to practice and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or certificate or for issuance of a new license or certificate. (M) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license or certificate issued under this chapter shall not be effective unless or until accepted by the board. A telephone conference call may be utilized for acceptance of the surrender of an individual's license or certificate to practice. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. Reinstatement of a license or certificate surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application for a license or certificate made under the provisions of this chapter may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license or certificate to practice in accordance with this chapter or a certificate to recommend in accordance with rules adopted under section 4731.301 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4731.283 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. (5) At the request of the board, a license or certificate holder shall immediately surrender to the board a license or certificate that the board has suspended, revoked, or permanently revoked. (N) Sanctions shall not be imposed under division (B)(28) of this section against any person who waives deductibles and copayments as follows: (1) In compliance with the health benefit plan that expressly allows such a practice. Waiver of the deductibles or copayments shall be made only with the full knowledge and consent of the plan purchaser, payer, and third-party administrator. Documentation of the consent shall be made available to the board upon request. (2) For professional services rendered to any other person authorized to practice pursuant to this chapter, to the extent allowed by this chapter and rules adopted by the board. (O) Under the board's investigative duties described in this section and subject to division (F) of this section, the board shall develop and implement a quality intervention program designed to improve through remedial education the clinical and communication skills of individuals authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, and podiatric medicine and surgery. In developing and implementing the quality intervention program, the board may do all of the following: (1) Offer in appropriate cases as determined by the board an educational and assessment program pursuant to an investigation the board conducts under this section; (2) Select providers of educational and assessment services, including a quality intervention program panel of case reviewers; (3) Make referrals to educational and assessment service providers and approve individual educational programs recommended by those providers. The board shall monitor the progress of each individual undertaking a recommended individual educational program. (4) Determine what constitutes successful completion of an individual educational program and require further monitoring of the individual who completed the program or other action that the board determines to be appropriate; (5) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to further implement the quality intervention program. An individual who participates in an individual educational program pursuant to this division shall pay the financial obligations arising from that educational program. (P) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a conviction, plea of guilty, judicial finding of guilt, judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, or the commission of an act that constitutes a criminal offense, unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (Q) A license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend issued to an individual under this chapter and an individual's practice under this chapter in this state are automatically suspended if the individual's license or certificate to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services is suspended, revoked, or surrendered or relinquished in lieu of discipline by an agency responsible for authorizing, certifying, or regulating an individual to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services in this state or another jurisdiction. The automatic suspension begins immediately upon entry of the order by the agency and lasts for ninety days to permit the board to investigate the basis for the action under this chapter. Continued practice during the automatic suspension shall be considered practicing without a license or certificate. The board shall notify the individual subject to the automatic suspension by certified mail or in person in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual subject to an automatic suspension under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In that final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. Sec. 4731.297. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Academic medical center" means a medical school and its affiliated teaching hospitals and clinics partnering to do all of the following: (a) Provide the highest quality of patient care from expert physicians; (b) Conduct groundbreaking research leading to medical advancements for current and future patients; (c) Provide medical education and graduate medical education to educate and train physicians. (2) "Affiliated physician group practice" means a medical practice that consists of one or more physicians authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery and that is affiliated with an academic medical center to further the objectives described in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (c) of this section. (B) The state medical board shall issue, without examination, to an applicant who meets the requirements of this section a certificate of conceded eminence authorizing the practice of medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery as part of the applicant's employment with an academic medical center in this state or affiliated physician group practice in this state. (C) To be eligible for a certificate of conceded eminence, an applicant shall provide to the board all of the following: (1) Evidence satisfactory to the board of all of the following: (a) That the applicant is an international medical graduate who holds a medical degree from an educational institution listed in the international medical education directory; (b) That the applicant has been appointed to serve in this state as a full-time faculty member of a medical school accredited by the liaison committee on medical education or an osteopathic medical school accredited by the American osteopathic association; (c) That the applicant has accepted an offer of employment with an academic medical center in this state or affiliated physician group practice in this state; (d) That the applicant holds a license in good standing in another state or country authorizing the practice of medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (e) That the applicant has unique talents and extraordinary abilities not generally found within the applicant's specialty, as demonstrated by satisfying at least four of the following: (i) The applicant has achieved educational qualifications beyond those that are required for entry into the applicant's specialty, including advanced degrees, special certifications, or other academic credentials. (ii) The applicant has written multiple articles in journals listed in the index medicus or an equivalent scholarly publication acceptable to the board. (iii) The applicant has a sustained record of excellence in original research, at least some of which involves serving as the principal investigator or co-principal investigator for a research project. (iv) The applicant has received nationally or internationally recognized prizes or awards for excellence. (v) The applicant has participated in peer review in a field of specialization that is the same as or similar to the applicant's specialty. (vi) The applicant has developed new procedures or treatments for complex medical problems that are recognized by peers as a significant advancement in the applicable field of medicine. (vii) The applicant has held previous academic appointments with or been employed by a health care organization that has a distinguished national or international reputation. (viii) The applicant has been the recipient of a national institutes of health or other competitive grant award. (f) That the applicant has received staff membership or professional privileges from the academic medical center pursuant to standards adopted under section 3701.351 of the Revised Code on a basis that requires the applicant's medical education and graduate medical education to be at least equivalent to that of a physician educated and trained in the United States; (g) That the applicant has sufficient written and oral English skills to communicate effectively and reliably with patients, their families, and other medical professionals; (h) That the applicant will have professional liability insurance through the applicant's employment with the academic medical center or affiliated physician group practice. (2) An attestation that the applicant agrees to practice only within the clinical setting of the academic medical center or for the affiliated physician group practice; (3) Three letters of reference from distinguished experts in the applicant's specialty attesting to the unique capabilities of the applicant, at least one of which must be from outside the academic medical center or affiliated physician group practice; (4) An affidavit from the dean of the medical school where the applicant has been appointed to serve as a faculty member stating that the applicant meets all of the requirements of division (C)(1) of this section and that the letters of reference submitted under division (C)(3) of this section are from distinguished experts in the applicant's specialty, and documentation to support the affidavit; (5) A fee of one thousand dollars for the certificate. (D)(1) The holder of a certificate of conceded eminence may practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery only within the clinical setting of the academic medical center with which the certificate holder is employed or for the affiliated physician group practice with which the certificate holder is employed. (2) A certificate holder may supervise medical students, supervise physicians participating in graduate medical education, collaborate with advanced practice registered nurses, and collaborate with physician assistants when performing clinical services in the certificate holder's area of specialty. (E) The board may revoke a certificate issued under this section on receiving proof satisfactory to the board that the certificate holder has engaged in practice in this state outside the scope of the certificate or that there are grounds for action against the certificate holder under section 4731.22 of the Revised Code. (F) A certificate of conceded eminence is valid for the shorter of two years or the duration of the certificate holder's employment with the academic medical center or affiliated physician group practice. The certificate ceases to be valid if the holder resigns or is otherwise terminated from the academic medical center or affiliated physician group practice. (G) A certificate of conceded eminence may be renewed for an additional two-year period. There is no limit on the number of times a certificate may be renewed. A person seeking renewal of a certificate shall apply to the board and is eligible for renewal if the applicant does all of the following: (1) Pays the renewal fee of one thousand dollars; (2) Provides to the board an affidavit and supporting documentation from the academic medical center or affiliated physician group practice of all of the following: (a) That the applicant's initial appointment to the medical faculty is still valid or has been renewed; (b) That the applicant's clinical practice is consistent with the established standards in the field; (c) That the applicant has demonstrated continued scholarly achievement; (d) That the applicant has demonstrated continued professional achievement consistent with the academic medical center's requirements, established pursuant to standards adopted under section 3701.351 of the Revised Code, for physicians with staff membership or professional privileges with the academic medical center. (3) Satisfies the same continuing medical education requirements set forth in section 4731.282 of the Revised Code that apply to a person who holds a certificate to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery issued under this chapter. (4) Complies with any other requirements established by the board. (H) The board shall not require a person to obtain a certificate under Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery if the person holds a certificate of conceded eminence issued under this section. (I) The board may adopt any rules it considers necessary to implement this section. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4731.33. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Light-based medical device" means any device that can be made to produce or amplify electromagnetic radiation at wavelengths equal to or greater than one hundred eighty nm but less than or equal to 1.0 X 106 nm and that is manufactured, designed, intended, or promoted for irradiation of any part of the human body for the purpose of affecting the structure or function of the body. (2) "Physician" means a person authorized to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery under this chapter. (3) "On-site supervision" means the supervising physician is physically in the same location as the delegate during the use of a light-based medical device, but does not require the physician to be in the same room. "On-site supervision" includes the supervising physician's presence in the same office suite as the delegate during the use of the device. (4) "Off-site supervision" means the supervising physician is continuously available for direct communication with the cosmetic therapist during the use of a light-based medical device. (5) "Direct physical oversight" means the supervising physician is in the same room directly observing the delegate's use of the light-based medical device. (B) A physician may delegate the application of light-based medical devices for the purpose of hair removal only if all of the following conditions are met: (1) The light-based medical device has been specifically cleared or approved by the United States food and drug administration for the removal of hair from the human body. (2) The use of the light-based medical device for the purpose of hair removal is within the physician's normal course of practice and expertise. (3) The physician has seen and evaluated the patient to determine whether the proposed application of the specific light-based medical device is appropriate. (4) The physician has seen and evaluated the patient following the initial application of the specific light-based medical device, but before any continuation of treatment, to determine that the patient responded well to that initial application of the specific light-based medical device. (5) The person to whom the delegation is made is one of the following: (a) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code with whom the physician has an effective supervision agreement; (b) A person who was licensed as a cosmetic therapist under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code on April 11, 2021; (c) A person who has completed a cosmetic therapy course of instruction for a minimum of seven hundred fifty clock hours and received a passing score on the certified laser hair removal professional examination administered by the society for clinical and medical hair removal; (d) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (C) For delegation to a physician assistant, the delegation must meet the requirements of section 4730.21 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) For delegation to a person described under division (B)(5)(b) or (c) of this section, the physician shall ensure that the person to whom the delegation is made has received adequate education and training to provide the level of skill and care necessary, including all of the following: (a) The person has completed eight hours of basic education that includes the following topics: (i) Light-based procedure physics; (ii) Tissue interaction in light-based procedures; (iii) Light-based procedure safety, including use of proper safety equipment; (iv) Clinical application of light-based procedures; (v) Preoperative and postoperative care of light-based procedure patients; (vi) Reporting of adverse events. (b) The person has observed fifteen procedures for each specific type of light-based medical device procedure for hair removal that the person will perform under the delegation. (c) The person shall perform at least twenty procedures under the direct physical oversight of the physician on each specific type of light-based medical device procedure for hair removal delegated. (2) For purposes of division (D)(1)(b)(C)(1)(b) of this section, the procedures observed shall be performed by a physician who uses the specific light-based medical device procedure for hair removal in the physician's normal course of practice and expertise. (3) For purposes of division (D)(1)(c)(C)(1)(c) of this section, the physician overseeing the performance of these procedures shall use this specific light-based medical device procedure for hair removal within the physician's normal course of practice and expertise. (4) Each delegating physician and delegate shall document and retain satisfactory completion of training required under division (D)(C) of this section. The education requirement in division (D)(1)(a)(C)(1)(a) of this section shall be completed only once by the delegate regardless of the number of types of specific light-based medical device procedures for hair removal delegated and the number of delegating physicians. The training requirements of divisions (D)(1)(b)(C)(1)(b) and (c) of this section shall be completed by the delegate once for each specific type of light-based medical device procedure for hair removal delegated regardless of the number of delegating physicians. (E)(D) The following delegates are exempt from the education and training requirements of division (D)(1)(C)(1) of this section: (1) A person who, before the effective date of this section September 30, 2021, has been applying a light-based medical device for hair removal for at least two years through a lawful delegation by a physician; (2) A person described under division (B)(5)(b) of this section if the person was authorized to use a light-based medical device under the cosmetic therapist license; (3) A person described in division (B)(5)(a) or (d) of this section. (F)(E) For delegation to a person under division (B)(5)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, the physician shall provide on-site supervision at all times that the person to whom the delegation is made is applying the light-based medical device. A physician shall not supervise more than two delegates under division (B)(5)(b), (c), or (d) of this section at the same time. (G)(1)(F)(1) Notwithstanding division (F)(E) of this section, a physician may provide off-site supervision when the light-based medical device is applied for the purpose of hair removal to an established patient if the person to whom the delegation is made is a cosmetic therapist who meets all of the following criteria: (a) The cosmetic therapist has successfully completed a course in the use of light-based medical devices for the purpose of hair removal that has been approved by the delegating physician; (b) The course consisted of at least fifty hours of training, at least thirty hours of which was clinical experience; (c) The cosmetic therapist has worked under the on-site supervision of the delegating physician for a sufficient period of time that the physician is satisfied that the cosmetic therapist is capable of competently performing the service with off-site supervision. (2) The cosmetic therapist shall maintain documentation of the successful completion of the required training. (H)(G) A delegate under this section shall immediately report to the supervising physician any clinically significant side effect following the application of the light-based medical device or any failure of the treatment to progress as was expected at the time the delegation was made. The physician shall see and personally evaluate the patient who has experienced the clinically significant side effect or whose treatment is not progressing as expected as soon as practicable. (I)(H) No physician shall fail to comply with division (A), (B), (G)(F), or (H)(G) of this section. A violation of this division constitutes a departure from, or the failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances, whether or not actual injury to a patient is established, under division (B)(6) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code. (J)(I) No physician shall delegate the application of light-based medical devices for the purpose of hair removal to a person who is not listed in division (B)(5) of this section. A violation of this division constitutes violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate section 4731.41 of the Revised Code for purposes of division (B)(20) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code. (K)(J) No cosmetic therapist to whom a delegation is made under division (B)(5)(b) or (c) of this section shall fail to comply with division (G)(F) or (H)(G) of this section. A violation of this division constitutes the unauthorized practice of medicine pursuant to section 4731.41 of the Revised Code. (L)(K) No physician assistant shall fail to comply with division (H)(G) of this section. A violation of this division constitutes a departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar physician assistants under the same or similar circumstances, regardless of whether actual injury to patient is established, for purposes of division (B)(19) of section 4730.25 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4761.17. All of the following apply to the practice of respiratory care by a person who holds a license or limited permit issued under this chapter: (A) The person shall practice only pursuant to a prescription or other order for respiratory care issued by any of the following: (1) A physician; (2) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse and has entered into a standard care arrangement with a physician; (3) A certified registered nurse anesthetist who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse and acts in compliance with section 4723.43 of the Revised Code; (4) A physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority, and has entered into a supervision agreement that allows the physician assistant to prescribe or order respiratory care servicesas provided in section 4730.15 of the Revised Code, subject to the conditions under which the physician assistant is practicing, as provided in section 4730.08 of the Revised Code. (B) The person shall practice only under the supervision of any of the following: (1) A physician; (2) A certified nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or clinical nurse specialist; (3) A physician assistant who is authorized to prescribe or order respiratory care services as provided in division (A)(4) of this section. (C)(1) When practicing under the prescription or order of a certified nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist or under the supervision of such a nurse, the person's administration of medication that requires a prescription is limited to the drugs that the nurse is authorized to prescribe pursuant to section 4723.481 of the Revised Code. (2) When practicing under the order of a certified registered nurse anesthetist, the person's administration of medication is limited to the drugs that the nurse is authorized to order or direct the person to administer, as provided in section 4723.43 of the Revised Code. (3) When practicing under the prescription or order of a physician assistant or under the supervision of a physician assistant, the person's administration of medication that requires a prescription is limited to the drugs that the physician assistant is authorized to prescribe pursuant to the physician assistant's physician-delegated prescriptive authority. Sec. 4765.51. Nothing in this chapter prevents or restricts the practice, services, or activities of any registered nurse practicing within the scope of the registered nurse's practice. Nothing in this chapter prevents or restricts the practice, services, or activities of any physician assistant practicing in accordance with a supervision agreement entered into under section 4730.19 of the Revised Code, including, if applicable, the policies of the health care facility in which the physician assistant is practicingsection 4730.08 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this chapter prevents or restricts the practice, services, or activities of any certified mental health assistant practicing in accordance with a supervision agreement entered into under section 4772.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4773.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "General x-ray machine operator" means an individual who operates ionizing radiation-generating equipment in order to perform standard radiology procedures; whose performance of such procedures is limited to specific body sites; and who does not, to any significant degree, determine procedure positioning or the dosage of radiation to which a patient is exposed. (B) "Chiropractor" means an individual licensed under Chapter 4734. of the Revised Code to practice chiropractic. (C) "Ionizing radiation" means any electromagnetic or particulate radiation that interacts with atoms to produce ionization in matter, including x-rays, gamma rays, alpha and beta particles, high speed electrons, neutrons, and other nuclear particles. (D) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (E) "Podiatrist" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice podiatric medicine and surgery. (F) "Nuclear medicine technologist" means an individual who does all of the following: (1) Prepares and administers radio-pharmaceuticals to human beings; (2) Conducts in vivo or in vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes; (3) Documents orders for radio-pharmaceuticals in patient medical records. (G) "Radiation therapy technologist" means an individual who utilizes ionizing radiation-generating equipment, including therapy simulator radiation-generating equipment, for therapeutic purposes on human beings. "Radiation therapy technologist" is the same as a radiation therapist. (H) "Radiographer" means an individual who does all of the following in order to perform a comprehensive scope of radiology procedures on human beings: (1) Operates ionizing radiation-generating equipment; (2) Administers contrast; (3) Documents orders for contrast in patient medical records; (4) Determines procedure positioning; (5) Determines the dosage of ionizing radiation. (I) "Mechanotherapist" means an individual who holds a certificate issued under section 4731.15 of the Revised Code authorizing the individual to practice mechanotherapy. (J) "Physician assistant" means an individual who is licensed to practice as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4773.02. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, no person shall practice or hold self out as a general x-ray machine operator, radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist without a valid license issued under this chapter for the person's area of practice. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (1) A Any of the following practitioners, to the extent that an activity subject to this chapter is within the practitioner's scope of practice: a physician, podiatrist, physician assistant, mechanotherapist, or chiropractor; (2) An individual Any of the following practitioners licensed under Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code, to practice dentistry, to practice as a the extent that an activity subject to this chapter is within the practitioner's scope of practice: a dentist, dental hygienist, or to practice as a dental x-ray machine operator; (3) As specified in 42 C.F.R. 75, radiologic personnel employed by the federal government or serving in a branch of the armed forces of the United States; (4) Students engaging in any of the activities performed by basic x-ray machine operators, radiographers, radiation therapy technologists, and nuclear medicine technologists as an integral part of a program of study leading to receipt of a license issued under this chapter or Chapter 4715., 4730., 4731., or 4734. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4773.06. (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, a general x-ray machine operator may perform radiologic procedures only if direct supervision is being provided. Direct supervision shall be provided by a physician, podiatrist, physician assistant, mechanotherapist, or chiropractor is providing direct supervision. Direct supervision does not require the supervising practitioner to observe each radiologic procedure performed by the operator, but does require that the supervising practitioner to be present at the location where the operator is performing radiologic procedures for purposes of consulting with and directing the operator while performing the procedures. A practitioner supervising a general x-ray machine operator may authorize the operator to perform only those radiologic procedures that are within the practitioner's scope of practice as determined by the laws under which the practitioner is authorized to practice. (B) A radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist may perform radiologic procedures only if a physician is providing general supervision is being provided. General supervision shall be provided by a physician, except that in the case of computed tomography procedures, general supervision also may be provided by a physician assistant. General supervision does not require the physician supervising practitioner to observe each radiologic procedure performed or to be present at the location where the procedure is being performed, but does require that the physician supervising practitioner to be readily available for purposes of consulting with and directing the individual while performing the procedures. (C) A general x-ray machine operator who is licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice as a registered nurse and is providing occupational health nursing services in an industrial workplace may perform radiologic procedures under a physician's or physician assistant's general supervision, as described in division (B) of this section. Sec. 5122.10. (A)(1) Any of the following who has reason to believe that a person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination may take the person into custody and may immediately transport the person to a hospital or, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, to a general hospital not licensed by the department of behavioral health where the person may be held for the period prescribed in this section: (a) A psychiatrist; (b) A or any other licensed physician; (b) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code; (c) A licensed clinical psychologist; (d) A clinical nurse specialist who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health CNS by the American nurses credentialing center; (e) A certified nurse practitioner who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health NP by the American nurses credentialing center; (f) A health officer; (g) A parole officer; (h) A police officer; (i) A sheriff. (2) If the chief of the adult parole authority or a parole or probation officer with the approval of the chief of the authority has reason to believe that a parolee, an offender under a community control sanction or post-release control sanction, or an offender under transitional control is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination, the chief or officer may take the parolee or offender into custody and may immediately transport the parolee or offender to a hospital or, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, to a general hospital not licensed by the department of behavioral health where the parolee or offender may be held for the period prescribed in this section. (B) A written statement shall be given to the hospital by the individual authorized under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section to transport the person. The statement shall specify the circumstances under which such person was taken into custody and the reasons for the belief that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination. This statement shall be made available to the respondent or the respondent's attorney upon request of either. (C) Every reasonable and appropriate effort shall be made to take persons into custody in the least conspicuous manner possible. A person taking the respondent into custody pursuant to this section shall explain to the respondent: the name and professional designation and affiliation of the person taking the respondent into custody; that the custody-taking is not a criminal arrest; and that the person is being taken for examination by mental health professionals at a specified mental health facility identified by name. (D) If a person taken into custody under this section is transported to a general hospital, the general hospital may admit the person, or provide care and treatment for the person, or both, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, but by the end of twenty-four hours after arrival at the general hospital, the person shall be transferred to a hospital as defined in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (E) A person transported or transferred to a hospital or community mental health services provider under this section shall be examined by the staff of the hospital or services provider within twenty-four hours after arrival at the hospital or services provider. If to conduct the examination requires that the person remain overnight, the hospital or services provider shall admit the person in an unclassified status until making a disposition under this section. After the examination, if the chief clinical officer of the hospital or services provider believes that the person is not a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the chief clinical officer shall release or discharge the person immediately unless a court has issued a temporary order of detention applicable to the person under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. After the examination, if the chief clinical officer believes that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the chief clinical officer may detain the person for not more than three court days following the day of the examination and during such period admit the person as a voluntary patient under section 5122.02 of the Revised Code or file an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. If neither action is taken and a court has not otherwise issued a temporary order of detention applicable to the person under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer shall discharge the person at the end of the three-day period unless the person has been sentenced to the department of rehabilitation and correction and has not been released from the person's sentence, in which case the person shall be returned to that department. Sec. 5164.301. (A) As used in this section, "group practice" has the same meaning as in section 4731.65 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of medicaid shall establish a process by which a physician assistant may enter into a provider agreement. (C)(1) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, a claim for medicaid payment for a medicaid service provided by a physician assistant to a medicaid recipient may be submitted by the physician assistant who provided the service or the physician, group practice, clinic, or other health care facility that employs the physician assistant. (2) A claim for medicaid payment may be submitted by the physician assistant who provided the service only if the physician assistant has a valid provider agreement. When submitting the claim, the physician assistant shall use only the medicaid provider number the department has assigned to the physician assistant. (D) If a physician assistant submits a claim under this section, the medicaid program shall provide payment to the physician assistant to the same extent that the program provides payment to any other provider for providing an equivalent health care service. Sec. 5903.12. (A) As used in this section: "Continuing education" means continuing education required of a licensee by law and includes, but is not limited to, the continuing education required of licensees under sections 3737.881, 3776.07, 3781.10, 4701.11, 4715.141, 4715.25, 4717.09, 4723.24, 4725.16, 4725.51, 4730.14, 4730.49, 4731.155, 4731.282, 4734.25, 4735.141, 4741.16, 4741.19, 4751.24, 4751.25, 4755.63, 4757.33, 4759.06, 4761.06, 4763.07, and 4772.081 of the Revised Code. "Reporting period" means the period of time during which a licensee must complete the number of hours of continuing education required of the licensee by law. (B) A licensee may submit an application to a licensing agency, stating that the licensee requires an extension of the current reporting period because the licensee has served on active duty during the current or a prior reporting period. The licensee shall submit proper documentation certifying the active duty service and the length of that active duty service. Upon receiving the application and proper documentation, the licensing agency shall extend the current reporting period by an amount of time equal to the total number of months that the licensee spent on active duty during the current reporting period. For purposes of this division, any portion of a month served on active duty shall be considered one full month. Section 2. That existing sections 1.64, 2108.16, 2108.61, 2111.031, 2111.49, 2133.211, 2305.51, 2907.13, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3705.01, 3705.09, 3705.15, 3705.16, 3705.17, 3705.22, 3705.29, 3705.30, 3705.33, 3705.35, 3705.99, 3715.50, 3719.06, 3719.064, 3727.06, 3727.70, 3728.01, 4723.36, 4725.27, 4725.40, 4725.53, 4725.56, 4725.59, 4729.01, 4729.39, 4730.01, 4730.02, 4730.03, 4730.04, 4730.05, 4730.06, 4730.07, 4730.08, 4730.141, 4730.15, 4730.20, 4730.201, 4730.203, 4730.204, 4730.22, 4730.25, 4730.26, 4730.39, 4730.41, 4730.411, 4730.43, 4730.432, 4730.433, 4730.437, 4730.49, 4730.53, 4730.56, 4731.22, 4731.297, 4731.33, 4761.17, 4765.51, 4773.01, 4773.02, 4773.06, 5122.10, 5164.301, and 5903.12 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 4730.19, 4730.202, 4730.21, 4730.38, 4730.42, and 4730.44 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. Division (C)(2) of section 4730.05 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, does not affect the members of the Physician Assistant Policy Committee of the State Medical Board who are serving on the effective date of this section and applies only to members who are appointed on or after that date. Section 5. Section 3902.65 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, applies to health benefit plans, as defined in section 3922.01 of the Revised Code, that are delivered, issued for delivery, modified, or renewed on or after the effective date of this section. Section 6. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 4729.01 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 52, H.B. 96, S.B. 56, and S.B. 152, all of the 136th General Assembly. Section 4730.53 of the Revised Code as amended by S.B. 110 of the 131st General Assembly and H.B. 394 and S.B. 276 both of the 130th General Assembly.